_	"Footsteps 2" follows the concept that captured the public’s imagination with "Footsteps", that of de Burgh creating cover versions of the songs which have inspired him over the years, along with a few new compositions.
_	Such definition is based on the concept that common elements with very large neighbourhoods are lesser significant when predicting a connection between two nodes compared with elements shared between a small number of nodes.
_	From the descriptions that have come down to us through the writings of those such as Plato, Aristoxenus and, later, Boethius, we can say with some caution that the ancient Greeks, at least before Plato, heard music that was primarily monophonic; that is, music built on single melodies based on a system of modes/scales, themselves built on the concept that notes should be placed between consonant intervals.
_	After discussing the concept that one should only study Torah after immersion in a mikveh, he describes 19 Kislev as "a day that will herald good tidings."
_	In addressing the linguistic problem of naming, Edna Andrews says that using "inclusive" and "neutral" language is based upon the concept that "language represents thought, and may even control thought."
_	However, the concept that the IAEA would serve as a bank of nuclear materials, drawing down US and Soviet stocks below the level where either could launch a knock-out blow against the other, languished.
_	According to theologians such as Leonardo Boff, The Latin American branch of Christian communist liberation theology is rooted in the concept that "prudence is the understanding of situations of radical crisis".
_	The work of Margulis is associated with the concept that digital color correction should seek to correspond to what a human observer would see if placed in the position of the camera.
_	The methodology is based on the concept that films associated with things audiences are already familiar with can be more effectively marketed to them, and as such are known as "pre-sold" films within the industry.
_	In economics, the marginal propensity to consume (MPC) is a metric that quantifies induced consumption, the concept that the increase in personal consumer spending (consumption) occurs with an increase in disposable income (income after taxes and transfers).
_	Wittgenstein introduced the concept that metaphysics could be influenced by theories of aesthetics, via logic, vis. a world composed of "atomical facts".
_	This drove the concept that cells are in a state of dynamic equilibrium, constantly using energy to maintain ion gradients.
_	These laws became the basis of the "Führerprinzip", the concept that Hitler's word overrode all existing laws.
_	The park focuses on positive African-American imagery to embrace the concept that "It takes a whole village to raise a child."
_	The language theories contribute to the concept that in order to conceive the structure of a sentence, resources are consumed.
_	The influential book by the Gang of Four, states: "The focus here is "encapsulating the concept that varies", a theme of many design patterns."
_	'Science of Life' comes from the concept that if every child could be scientifically shown the challenges and possibilities they would face in life and also shown their true self, they will be able to prepare and develop all the skills needed to live a great life.
_	The idea of a new Waldorf-Astoria hotel was based on the concept that a large, opulent hotel should be available in New York for distinguished visitors.
_	The theory is based on the concept that no deed is criminal in itself, but the definition of crime constitutes a part of the exercise of power.
_	They point attention to the concept that originality in fashion design is too insubstantial for copyright law to distinguish protected elements from non-protected elements, and that extending copyright protection would stifle independent designers while giving powerful, big-business fashion houses a near-monopoly.
_	"Erewhon" is a novel by Samuel Butler published in 1872 and dealing with the concept that machines could one day become sentient and supplant the human race.
_	Casting Crowns lead singer Mark Hall described the lyrical message of "Already There" as being relates the concept that "God is already sitting at the end of your life looking back at it".
_	They hypothesized that this "descended from a fish" legend was actually referring to the concept that the Merovingian line had married into the bloodline of Jesus Christ, since the symbol for early Christians had also been a fish.
_	Surplus economics is the study of economics based upon the concept that economies operate on the basis of the production of a surplus over basic needs.
_	He spoke out against "Gender Theory", that is the concept that gender identity is not definite and can change, being taught in schools.
_	He has developed the concept that the goal of the Christian be "sinless perfection," and that it is a requirement to be saved.
_	His theories revolved around the concept that altered nerve flow was the cause of all disease, and that misaligned spinal vertebrae had an effect on the nerve flow.
_	In an analysis of contemporary novelists in the area of women's erotic fiction, Carolyn Allen cites Antoniou's writings as describing the concept that all relationships between people include elements of power exchange, with one partner taking the more dominant role even in day-to-day interactions.
_	The modern evolutionary synthesis is based on the concept that populations of organisms have significant genetic variation caused by mutation and by the recombination of genes during sexual reproduction.
_	A major factor in the award was the concept that visitors would use a Newton device to access additional information, find out where they were in the museum, listen to audio, see animations, control robots and other media, and to bookmark information for printout at the end of the exhibit.
_	D'Augelli's LGB lifespan identity development model also introduced the concept that sexual orientation could be fluid, and that sexual identity could occur on a spectrum as opposed to a binary.
_	The Red Queen's hypothesis, presented by Leigh Van Valen, argues against the pulse model by favoring the concept that extinction occurs in a constant turnover.
_	There are currently nearly 30 participating Federal agencies, and thousands of individual projects which are employing the OSS model, and emphasizing the concept that their work and these data are the "People's" Code.
_	This pioneered the concept that blood drug levels must guide therapeutic dosages and he established the basis for the chemotherapy of malaria.
_	In September 2012, Garland said that he would explore the "Origins" and "Democracy" storylines, would introduce characters Judge Cal and Chopper, and would pursue the concept that Judge Dredd is a fascist.
_	Lord Hoffmann provided guidance on the concept that British copyright law protects the expression of the idea rather than the idea itself.
_	One of Sturtevant’s principal contributions was his introduction to the concept that the frequency of crossing-over between two genes could help determine their proximity on a linear genetic map.
_	As a purely semantic mechanism, and to maintain ambiguity, the court of Augustus sustained the concept that any worship given to an emperor was paid to the "position of emperor" rather than the person of the emperor.
_	Syntactic meaning composition starts from the lexical meanings of the primitive constituents in a syntactic quadruple: 'basic syntactic meanings' are pairs of a concept, assigned to a primitive constituent by the lexical interpretation, and a 'contextual embedding' of the concept that involves potential speakers and utterances.
_	There are some factories that only transcribe a certain set of related genes, this further strengthens the concept that the main function of a transcription factory is for transcriptional efficiency.
_	Film historian Wyndham Wise suggests that "Women are Warriors", specifically, promoted the concept that “women were not leisurely idlers before the conflict”.
_	In the 20th century, the notion that human beings are rationally autonomous was challenged by the concept that humans were driven by unconscious irrational desires.
_	He also wrote on the philosophy of science in "Experience and Theory" (1966), including work on theoretical incommensurability, the concept that two directly contradictory theories – such as classical mechanics and relativity – can coexist, without either being specifically "wrong".
_	"Already There", described as "echoing "Clocks"-era Coldplay", relates the concept that "God is already sitting at the end of your life looking back at it".
_	Social constructionism, briefly, is the concept that there are many things that people "know" or take to be "reality" that are at least partially, if not completely, socially situated.
_	In Congress, Mellish responded to the Panic of 1873 by advocating a stable monetary system based on "soft money"—the concept that paper money backed by the strength and credit of the federal government would provide more stability and economic opportunity for farmers and the working class than "hard money"—gold or silver reserves in banks sufficient to allow holders of paper money to redeem their currency for specie on demand.
_	The word is new, but the concept that "glamping" connotes, that of luxurious tent-living, is not.
_	As early as 1938, literature began appearing in the field of Public Administration challenging the validity of POSDCORB and the concept that there could even be a rigid set of principles in administration.
_	These phrases reflect the concept that "within each person, there are opposing natures continually in conflict" and are referenced many times in the rabbinic tradition.
_	or the concept that there might actually be no right answers to some questions.
_	The driving force behind the centralizing fleet services is the philosophy of “core mission”, the concept that the resources of each department should be focused on their area of expertise.
_	Despite its rejection within the scientific community, MacDougall's experiment popularized the concept that the soul has weight, and specifically that it weighs 21 grams.
_	Most often, frictional stress is described as being analogous to the stress that results from the flow of a viscous fluid, but in many engineering materials, in soft biological tissues, and in living cells, the concept that friction arises only from a viscous stress is now known to be erroneous.
_	This further emphasises the concept that being in an uneasy, not to say miserable, situation is a shameful one, and poverty porn in media exposes those who do not necessarily have the desire to be exposed.
_	It was used in Anfinsen's seminal research on protein folding which led to the concept that a protein's 3-dimensional structure was determined by its amino-acid sequence.
_	He accused Haber of "dishonest change of subject: at no point does Haber defend the lawsuits I actually criticize", and ended by noting that Haber did not respond to "the most important part of my op-ed" about "trial lawyers ... trying to undo [the concept that a deal is a deal] retroactively".
_	Many of these images of Welsh costume were marketed as souvenirs of Wales and they helped to preserve the concept that there was something unique about Welsh costume.
_	David Engwicht is also a strong proponent of the concept that street life, rather than physical redesign, is the primary tool of street reclamation.
_	Colbert's first reference to Wikipedia was during the July 31, 2006 broadcast, when "The Word" was Wikiality, defined as the concept that "together we can create a reality that we all agree on—the reality we just agreed on".
_	This phrase plays both on the concept that in principle any representation can be presented according to the on/off binary logic of computing.
_	Ruin value () is the concept that a building be designed such that if it eventually collapsed, it would leave behind aesthetically pleasing ruins that would last far longer without any maintenance at all.
_	The law in action concept was a natural fit for Wisconsin because of its strong emphasis on the social sciences and the Wisconsin Idea—the concept that the boundaries of campus are the boundaries of the state.
_	Furthermore, the concept that people are uncontrollable and may offend against those norms in social interactions, cannot be explained by simply counting how many people practice the golden rule (see the general discussion in Braithwaite: 1989).
_	Research has attested to the concept that reducing stigma and discrimination is critical to the success of HIV care, treatment and prevention efforts.
_	Archimedes also introduced the concept that fluid flow was driven by a pressure gradient within the fluid.
_	Central to Unification teachings is the concept that fallen mankind can be restored to God only through Christ (the Messiah), who comes as a new Adam to become the new head of the human race (replacing the sinful parents), through whom mankind can be reborn into God's family.
_	Figuratively it also describes the concept that a judge does not "add up" the number of arguments but instead bases their decision on the strength of those arguments.
_	Pete flatly rejects the concept that Benson wasn't in on the situation and proceeds to try and strong-arm him out of Chevy's good books.
_	This form of plasticity highlights the concept that external stimuli in a given context activate neural and hormonal mechanisms or pathways which already exist inside the organism.
_	The "cathedral idea"—the concept that a bishop's main church is more than a parish church, and is the "Mother church"—had not yet taken hold in the United States.
_	The Three Affiliated Tribes of the Fort Berthold Reservation in New Town, North Dakota endorsed the concept that a locally based higher education institution was needed to train Tribal members and to help retain the Tribal cultures.
_	In addition, they argued that the sale of prepackaged ice cream bearing the “Steve’s” name was inconsistent with the concept that Steve’s was a premium hand-made ice cream.
_	The suits came from the concept that when you were a jazz player in the '40s, '50s '60s, to look straight, you had to wear a suit."
_	Arguing that he completely ignores the concept that the U.S. might undertake any foreign interventions with good intentions, she asserts that his book is not easy to read, and that his "glib and caustic tone" are distracting.
_	Grammaticalization describes the concept that individual words or constructions may come to express abstract grammatical meaning (e.g. future tense) as users increasingly pair frequent words with a given meaning.
_	Foam plasma pressure is the concept that Chuck Hansen introduced during the Progressive case, based on research that located declassified documents listing special foams as liner components within the radiation case of thermonuclear weapons.
_	While most people believe that technology isolates people, Samsung opted to promote the concept that technology unites people.
_	This drove the concept that cells are in a state of dynamic equilibrium, constantly using energy to maintain ion gradients.
_	While this is not a new concept, Wimber was a key figure in the introduction of the concept that praying for the sick (or anything else) shouldn't be saved for special healing services, but should take place at every Church service, and out on the streets (by every believer).
_	Causal determinism is the concept that events within a given paradigm are bound by causality in such a way that any state (of an object or event) is completely determined by prior states.
_	Presumably these shields would have been used in religious and or militaristic ceremonies, yet this does not discount the concept that they were exclusively employed in displays of pageantry.
_	The value of the experimental surgery championed by Battey is less that it contributed to an improvement of women's physical, emotional and mental well being, and more that it incidentally helped in the perfection of pelvic surgery and provided clear evidence for the concept that there was an unambiguous relationship between ovarian function and menstruation.
_	This data reinforces the concept that there a multiple toxins that are capable of producing similar physiological results via very different activation mechanisms.
_	This statement is supporting the concept that species and individuals are not static, and that when they change it is due to a new purpose given.
_	Reincarnation is the concept that the soul, after biological death, begins a new life in a new body.
_	In Kiel he also theoretically formulated the concept that galaxies ought to be described by stars forming in populations of embedded star clusters.
_	Theologically, the Babylonian exiles were responsible for the doctrines of individual responsibility and universalism (the concept that one god controls the entire world) and for the increased emphasis on purity and holiness.
_	Government of Sindh, with the concept that information technology education should come within the reach of common people, introduced a three-year Bachelor in Computer Science program in ten public sector colleges of the province in 2001.
_	Reaney depends on the concept that we, the audience, are all “children of an older growth” and his audience have responded to this expectation.
_	In 1974, the ideas of conservation, spirit, science and culture that inspired the Wilderness Leadership School expanded into the concept that became The WILD Foundation and WILD's sister organizations in The Wilderness Network.
_	A premise of sex magic is the concept that sexual energy is a potent force that can be harnessed to transcend one's normally perceived reality.
_	Amongst the ongoing debates surrounding prostitution in Italy are the legal scholars who advocate "diritto leggero", the concept that the State should intervene only minimally in matters considered the free choice of the individual.
_	It was based on the concept that the Vietnam War would dwindle away into defeat for the communists.
_	This figure is used to demonstrate the concept that by increasing the vapor pressure in a given system, more condensation will occur.
_	In social psychology, fundamental attribution error (FAE), also known as correspondence bias or attribution effect, is the concept that, in contrast to interpretations of their own behavior, people tend to (unduly) emphasize the agent's internal characteristics (character or intention), rather than external factors, in explaining other people's behavior.
_	It was designed as a test of the use of high explosives to create harbors in hard substrate and as a proof of the concept that small nuclear charges could be used for civil works projects.
_	King partly based his concept for Rose Red on the Winchester Mystery House in San Jose, California, but added the concept that the house could appear larger and different on the inside even though it looked the same from the outside.
_	Because the school's students, teachers and staff come from many nations (50 nationalities are represented on the five campuses, with 39 languages spoken at home), social studies and the concept that we are all citizens of one world are emphasized.
_	Shapiro conveys the idea that telethon was similar to a "secular religion", promoting the concept that "Disability was barely tolerable—and only to be pitied".
_	This illustrates the concept that the Jefferies tubes can be navigated as passageways to connect to different sections of the ship during Alert status and reduced power scenarios since the turbolifts may not be functional or prohibited.
_	The stock market lost confidence, partly due to the concept that telecoms were similar to dot com (both were categorised as 'high technology' in the listings) and share prices tumbled.
_	It refers to the concept that anything expedient around the area of the hips can be used as a weapon.
_	This is generally tied-in with the concept that disgusting and messy substances spilled onto someone else are humorous.
_	While the scale has been defined as a grading system for feminized or undermasculinized genitalia, the concept that atypical genitals are necessarily abnormal is contested.
_	Changping had a greater impact on folklore and popular culture than history, with various stories revolving around the concept that she survived her early death.
_	“LCLC is organized around the concept that the underpinning of a healthy relationship is a strong friendship, as indicated by positive emotions shared in nonconflict interactions.
_	The consideration was postured due to the nature of the 'metadata' being retained under the Act and the concept that whilst not directly capturing the content of communications undertaken the bill gives considerable leeway in the kind of metadata being collected.
_	Parts of Filipino wedding ceremonies have become faith-centered and God-centered, which also highlights the concept that the joining of two individuals is a "life long commitment" of loving and caring.
_	Another company, Eterni.me, also produces AI that is "remarkably similar" to the robot Ash in "Be Right Back"; cofounder Marius Ursache has commented that "we're trying to stay away from that idea" about "the concept that it's a way for grieving loved ones to stall moving on" and that the AI depicted in this episode is a "creepier version" of their ideas.
_	She rejected the concept that the woman was a "shamed" victim, and called on women to bear and love their children.
_	Wagner introduced the concept that all previous stories were 'folklore' and the current series was the truth, giving him free rein to alter a number of details (such as giving Johnny an AI computer assistant and Kreelman having been President of a unified Earth government).
_	Such understanding of ability is still not enough to oppose Bayle’s argumentation against theodicy in line with theology, as it accepts the concept that those who are saved will sin in future, too – therefore Wolniewicz constructed a slightly different definition of ability that he calls „pseudo-Diodoric”.
_	The Book of Abraham, canonized by the LDS Church after Smith's death, also emphasized the plurality of gods, pre-mortal existence, and the concept that the earth had been organized out of preexisting matter.
_	A sweet, simple young woman who cannot really cope with the concept that the universe has suddenly opened up to her, Katarina believes that she is dead, and that the Doctor is a god transporting her to the next life.
_	In collaboration with various other chemists, Knorr proved the concept that ethyl acetoacetate existed in a keto and an enol forms.
_	Abrabanel later joined Nahmanides and Levi ben Gerson in promoting the concept that the "sons of God" were the older generations who were closer to physical perfection, as Adam and Eve were perfect.
_	He developed the concept that is today known as a normal subgroup.
_	It usually means the assertion of not just the concept of autonomy, but also the concept that the constitution derives from their own native traditions.
_	Confounding all of this is the concept that a single idea can be put forward as speaking for all of the people in Lebanon.
_	Advertising appealed to both patriotism and the concept that bras and girdles were somehow "protection".
_	It is an attempt to dispel the concept that copyright infringement only reduces the profits of large, faceless movie studios and rich movie stars.
_	The theory also envelops the concept that once an individual reaches the latest stages of life, they reach the level he titled as "ego integrity".
_	For the concept that nouns are "prototypically referential":
_	David Geffen had signed Dylan to Asylum Records, and worked with promoter Bill Graham on the concept that would become the Bob Dylan and the Band 1974 Tour.
_	Islamic jurists later formulated the concept that all classes were subject to the law of the land, and no person is above the law; officials and private citizens alike have a duty to obey the same law.
_	An idea fundamental to Roes' thinking on the topic of interculturality is the concept that that which unites the human race is much greater than that which divides it.
_	In singularity theory the general phenomenon of points and sets of singularities is studied, as part of the concept that manifolds (spaces without singularities) may acquire special, singular points by a number of routes.
_	While Paine was visiting an aunt in Kent, Pitt had a writ issued against J.S. Jordan, Paine's publisher, prosecuting him for seditious libel—a crime based on the concept that the executive was beyond reproach, that made it illegal to criticise the government.
_	Community policing in the Halton region is a philosophy based on the concept that police officers and private citizens work together, in partnership, resulting in creative ways to solve contemporary community problems related to crime, fear of crime, social and physical order, and neighborhood decay.
_	He has also written books such as "The Pursuit of Pleasure", which discussed the concept that evolution has established the biological mechanisms of pleasure and that they have survival origins.
_	This was the concept that one could build an artificial object which was a stronger stimulus or releaser for an instinct than the object for which the instinct originally evolved.
_	However, there have been a number of interpretations of the concept that have moved away from the central tenets of physical literacy.
_	The design was based on the concept that the high melting point of platinum would allow it to operate at high temperatures and that the evacuated chamber would contain fewer gas molecules to react with the platinum, improving its longevity.
_	Researchers who lead the Perry Preschool Project have received widespread acclaim for their contributions to the field, giving validity to the concept that early intervention is a powerful tool useful in alleviating educational and income inequality in America.
_	There is a gestalt dimension to the concept that is underlined by Lipman.
_	When it comes to foreign affairs, the party's stances tend to revolve around the concept that Egypt plays a pivotal role in the region and is a powerful state in what is otherwise a very uncertain part of the world.
_	Using this as a strength, Biver and Piguet rebuilt the brand on the concept that "Since 1735 there has never been a quartz Blancpain watch.
_	K.ILL is strictly and humorously faithful to the concept that its characters are experiencing reality, and are not merely characters in a role-playing game.
_	Both size classes lived alongside each other, and while researchers had previously suggested that they represent different species, Christopher Bennett showed that the differences between them are consistent with the concept that they represent females and males, and that "Pteranodon" species were sexually dimorphic.
_	This was also based on the concept that Walt Disney devised for Disneyland.
_	O'Riordan stated that the band did not understand or identify with the concept that Bayer had shown in the video, and thus, they decided to redo it, mixing the original tape with live footage from their American Tour.
_	When they speak of Palestine, of our country, they mean 'our country', that is to say 'not "their" country' [... this belief is based on the concept that in a State] one people, among the people residing there, should be granted the majority right.", and Ernst Simon held that the historical right "is binding on us rather than on the Arabs" and therefore an agreement with the Arabs is necessary.
_	The book is the origin of the term 'Rare Earth Hypothesis' which, like the book, asserts the concept that complex life is rare in the universe.
_	The book was eventually succeeded by a follow-up book called "The Life and Death of Planet Earth", also by Ward and Brownlee, which talks about the Earth's long term future and eventual demise under a warming and expanding Sun, showing readers the concept that planets like Earth have finite lifespans, and complex life is not just rare in space, but also rare in time, and is more likely to die out within a short time on geological timescales, while microbes dominate most of the planet's history.
_	"He invested the "Ch'a Ching" with the concept that dominated the religious thought of his age, whether Buddhist, Taoist, or Confucian: to see in the particular an expression of the universal".
_	The 1906 Jewish Encyclopedia states that the Talmudic-period rabbis created the concept that "Adam was created from the dust of the place where the sanctuary was to rise for the atonement of all human sin," i.e. the Jerusalem Temple's Holy of Holies, so that sin should not constitute a constant or characteristic attribute of human nature; Christians adapted this thought and relocated Adam's grave to what they considered to be the new place of atonement, Jesus' crucifixion site at Golgotha.
_	Based on the concept that the world economy has entered into a new economic era of uncertainty, CHAOTICS provides methods to allow companies to live with increased risk and uncertainty in an age of heightened turbulence and its consequent chaos.
_	Wegman is credited with coining the phrase "computational statistics" and developing a high-profile research program around the concept that computing resources could transform statistical techniques.
_	The neuron doctrine is the concept that the nervous system is made up of discrete individual cells, a discovery due to decisive neuro-anatomical work of Santiago Ramón y Cajal and later presented by, among others, H. Waldeyer-Hartz.
_	The tropical zodiac has no connection to the stars, and as long as no claims are made that the constellations themselves are in the associated sign, astrologers avoid the concept that precession seemingly moves the constellations because they don't reference them.
_	One of the fundamental principles of the Convention has been the concept that a driver is always fully in control and responsible for the behavior of a vehicle in traffic.
_	This argument silently rejects the concept that if a drug does not meet the criteria for any schedule, it should not be in any schedule.
_	The man credited with its invention, Francis Galton, says it is based on the concept that the evolution of man is crippled by the ill-conceived - those unfit to breed.
_	Willke was a proponent of the concept that women's bodies can resist pregnancy resulting from sexual assault, a position which the American Congress of Obstetricians and Gynecologists stated in 2012 is false.
_	During "Chasing Vermeer", Charles Fort's book, "Lo!", inspires the children to list and pay attention to coincidences as they realize that they are more than what they seem and explore the concept that they make up one unexplained pattern.
_	The book "Knowing and the Known" by philosophers John Dewey and Arthur Bentley (1949) is recognized as a critical source in defining the concept that is the basis of transactionalism.
_	Fox's script for "Flash of Two Worlds!", from "The Flash" #123 (Sept. 1961), introduced the concept that the Golden Age heroes existed on a parallel Earth named Earth-Two, as the current Flash, Barry Allen, travels to the Earth of Jay Garrick, the 1940s Flash.
_	Above all, he feared the influence of foreign, decadent poetry on the new Serbian poetry, since he never lost sight of the concept that poetry should serve to build a healthy and strong new generation.
_	Nevertheless, some interesting results on comets and stellar spectra were obtained that substantiate the concept that at any such institution the men who use the instruments are more important than the instruments.
_	Finality, in law, is the concept that certain disputes must achieve a resolution from which no further appeal may be taken, and from which no collateral proceedings may be permitted to disturb that resolution.
_	The imagery provides the basis for the concept that God gave Mary to humanity as the "Gate of Heaven" (thence the dedication of churches and convents to the Porta Coeli), an idea also laid out in the "Salve Regina" (Hail Holy Queen) prayer.
_	Health at Every Size (HAES) is an initiative that resulted from creation of NAAFA, and set forth the concept that health is better determined by medical testing - heart rate and blood pressure - rather than empirical observation of ones weight.
_	The doctrine is based on the concept that immigration is a question of national sovereignty, relating to a nation's right to define its own borders.
_	He also abandoned the concept that energy carries mass and wrote in connection to the above-mentioned recoil:
_	This date supports the concept that Charlemagne was technically an illegitimate child, although that is not mentioned by Einhardin either since he was born out of wedlock; Pepin and Bertrada were bound by a private contract or Friedelehe at the time of his birth, but did not marry until 744.
_	Similar to the concept that was later used by Silverjet, L'Avion offered a premium-only service on TransAtlantic routes.
_	One of Ayla's most important insights is the concept that men have something to do with the conception of children.
_	Snelson said his former professor Buckminster Fuller took credit for Snelson's discovery of the concept that Fuller named tensegrity.
_	Another point is that, as he was born to immigrant parents, Silvio Santos embodies the concept that Brazilians are a mixture of several different ethnicities.
_	In 1989 the municipal Cuerpo de Bomberos de Ponce were incorporated into the structure of the state's Cuerpo de Bomberos de Puerto Rico under the concept that Ponce residents would enjoy enhanced services and more modern facilities.
_	A major component of bin Laden's ideology was the concept that civilians from enemy countries, including women and children, were legitimate targets for jihadists to kill.
_	By using Mezirow's work, along with Robert Kegan's constructive developmental theory, Kligyte found the following themes: a move from non-reflective habitual action to a more conscious practice; a change in perspective to a more sophisticated view of teaching; an increased sense of agency, including the concept that academic practice is an object which can be controlled and shaped, rather than something externally imposed; increased confidence to take risks and experiment; and a more multifaceted idea of what it means to be an academic.
_	Ludovico Ariosto, in his epic Orlando Furioso (1513), jestingly sent his hero to a Moon where everything lost on Earth eventually turns up; but it was not until Galileo discovered (1609–1610) that the Moon had surface features, and that the other planets could, at least, be resolved into disks, that the concept that the planets were real physical bodies came to be taken seriously.
_	Socrates, despite holding some euhemeristic views, mocked the concept that all myths could be rationalized, noting that the mythical creatures of "absurd forms" such as Centaurs and the Chimera could not easily be explained.
_	Furthermore, Parker, after reviewing numerous genetic studies on plant disease resistance, failed to find a single example consistent with the concept that pathogens are the primary selective agent responsible for sexual reproduction in their host.
_	Plato also proposes the concept that sinners were cast under the ground to be punished in accordance with their sins in the Myth of Er.
_	The "Glosser and Friedman (continuum) model" is based upon the concept that deep dyslexia and phonological dyslexia are opposite endpoints on a "continuum" of reading disability.
_	Bester added to this mix the concept that human beings could learn to teleport, or "jaunte" from point to point, provided they know the exact locations of their departure and arrival and have physically seen the destination, similar to A. E. van Vogt's Gilbert Gosseyn in the 1948 novel "The World of Null-A".
_	This 'philosophy of us and them' is the key cause, the concept that you are either with us or you are against us.
_	Their paper introduced the concept that networks occur across multiple domains and that they are interrelated.
_	The research of Dr. Fred Luskin of Stanford University, and author of the book "Learning to forgive" presented evidence that forgiveness can be learned based on research projects into the effects of forgiveness, giving empirical validity to the concept that forgiveness is not only powerful, but also excellent for your health was presented with a Champion of Forgiveness from the Worldwide Forgiveness Alliance on Forgiveness Day (first Sunday of August) for his teaching forgiveness as a life skill.
_	In England, sovereign immunity referred to the concept that the king could not be sued without his consent.
_	Although the aircraft was well designed and the best of its class, being reasonably fast (Bf 110C-3 about 340 mph [547 km/h]) and possessing a respectable combat radius, the concept that the Bf 110 could defend bombers against a concerted attack by a force of fast single-seat, single-engined fighters was flawed.
_	Ogion tries to teach Ged about the "equilibrium", the concept that magic can upset the natural order of the world if used improperly.
_	Prior to the adoption of the doctrine in the English colonies in 1662, beginning in Virginia, English common law had held that among English subjects, a child's status was inherited from its father, based on the concept that a married couple were a unit headed by the father.
_	For example, from India, the concept that birth determines one's nature "is illustrated in the oft-repeated proverb: there can be no friendship between grass-eaters and meat-eaters, between a food and its eater".
_	Credited with coming up with the concept that became the Happy Gang, Pearl's on-air persona was "that slap-happy chappy, the Happy Gang's Own Pappy."
_	For a long time Adventists held the concept that the pre-advent judgment was only concerned with God judging mankind and deciding their eternal destiny.
_	An egalitarian attitude is the concept that everyone is equal.
_	In 1934 John R. Commons (1862–1945), another economist from midwestern America published "Institutional Economics" (1934), based on the concept that the economy is a web of relationships between people with diverging interests, including monopolies, large corporations, labor disputes, and fluctuating business cycles.
_	The CINDER threat is unlike other vulnerability based attacks in that the action taken by the initiator is not based on unauthorized access by unauthorized objects or authorized objects, it is based on the concept that authorized access by authorized objects will normally occur (along with their subsequent actions) within the security boundary.
_	The Berne Convention formally mandated several aspects of modern copyright law; it introduced the concept that a copyright exists the moment a work is "fixed", rather than requiring registration.
_	Such a model allowed the concept that celestial bodies could pass under the Earth, opening the way to Greek astronomy.
_	Often repeated in the novel is the concept that history is cyclical.
_	Although this work was published in the late 1930s the concept that is brought forth is interesting to note and is perhaps still quite relevant in contemporary times.
_	These have as in common the concept that he who sins must repent and as far as possible make reparation to Divine justice.
_	Aside from comics, Trinidad is working with the 3 Realms Collective which is a mural project in Oakland, California that contain the elements of spirituality and the concept that art is magic.
_	Since its start in 2004, the Afisha Picnic has followed the concept that mixes professional music festival featuring performances of international artists and local independent musicians, and urban-style event with all sorts of entertainment, such as designers’ market, gastronomic area, games and crafts, sports and amusements, lectures and workshops, and, on one occasion, even a dance floor on the rollerdrome.
_	Maitland wrote an "Inquiry into the Nature and Origin of Public Wealth" (1804 and 1819), in which he introduced the concept that has come to be known as the "Lauderdale Paradox": there is an inverse correlation between public wealth and private wealth; an increase in the one can only come at the cost of a decrease in the other.
_	This intertextual view of literature, as shown by Roland Barthes, supports the concept that the meaning of a text does not reside in the text, but is produced by the reader in relation not only to the text in question, but also the complex network of texts invoked in the reading process.
_	An example of Lutheran teaching is the concept that man does not find his way to God simply by doing good works, but only through belief ("sola fide").
_	The emergence of a sense of identity that is pan-Islamic rather than Pakistani has been defended as consistent with the founding ideology of Pakistan and the concept that "Islam itself is a nationality," despite the commonly held notion of "nationality, to Muslims, is like idol worship."
_	In linguistics, syllable weight is the concept that syllables pattern together according to the number and/or duration of segments in the rime.
_	Some advocates for the rights of sexual minorities resist linking that cause with the concept that sexuality is biologically determined or fixed at birth.
_	Other theorists were critical but Moltke’s insistence that local commanders be allowed freedom of action, has been defended by many German writers together with the concept that large armies made a loose style of command necessary.
_	The game originated from the concept that the player should control a king, rather than the hero, what they called an "inverted game" from the usual format.
_	Lyck introduced more challenging outdoor excursions to the programme and re-introduced the concept that each year would have a theme to tie all the activities together.
_	The 1957 Crittenden Report of the United States Navy Board of Inquiry concluded that there was "no sound basis for the belief that homosexuals posed a security risk" and criticized the prior Hoey Report: "No intelligence agency, as far as can be learned, adduced any factual data before that committee with which to support these opinions" and said that "the concept that homosexuals necessarily pose a security risk is unsupported by adequate factual data."
_	The expansion was put in place to capitalise on the concept that was deemed popular by the public.
_	The main building consists of three floors in accordance with Balinese philosophy of "Tri Hita Karana", the concept that emphasizes the three aspects of a human's complete happiness; to nurture harmony with God, with fellow human beings, and with nature.
_	During the San Francisco Peace Treaty discussions, John Foster Dulles, chief U.S. delegate to the peace conference, set forth the concept that Japan had "residual sovereignty" over the Ryukyu Islands.
_	Cundy v Lindsay (1877–78) LR 3 App Cas 459 is an English contract law case on the subject of mistake, introducing the concept that contracts could be automatically void for mistake to identity, where it is of crucial importance.
_	While he no longer favoured the concept that atolls formed on submerged volcanos, he noted some points on these islands which supported that idea: 16 volcanic craters resembled atolls in being raised slightly more on one side, and five hills appeared roughly equal in height.
_	Tory leader Robert Stanfield's rejection of the concept that Canada was composed of "two nations" ("deux nations") and that Quebec had the right to self-determination.
_	Generalization is the concept that humans and animals use past learning in present situations of learning if the conditions in the situations are regarded as similar.
_	The African Renaissance is the concept that African people and nations shall overcome the current challenges confronting the continent and achieve cultural, scientific, and economic renewal.
_	It was not until the Third Doctor serial "Spearhead from Space" that the programme's then writers came up with the concept that the Doctor has two hearts.
_	It is based upon the concept that color can affect the observer in various ways, and combines this with standard learning of basic notation.
_	He wrote his thesis on the concept that the Orthodox Church possessed infallibility when it acted together in conciliarity (e.g. the Ecumenical Councils).
_	This appears to contradict the concept that the ancestral molluscan radula was mineralized.
_	Some indigenous nations such as the Chickasaws and the Choctaws began to embrace the concept that African bodies were property, and equated blackness to hereditary inferiority.
_	Kasai’s butoh is strongly influenced by Eurythmy but it is also the extension of Hijikata’s butoh, especially in the role of language, and the concept that the body is something that is created, rather than given by nature.
_	In the time leading up to the 2005 Gaza Disengagement, Ha'ivri, together with Yisrael Meir Cohen, founded Revava ( means ten thousand), an organization which initially aimed at preventing the Gaza expulsion by encouraging nationwide protests to tie up the Israeli security forces, based on a play on words, and on the concept that ten thousand activists could actually stop the Israeli pullout from Gaza and North of Shomron.
_	In December 1964, she presented to the French National Assembly on the concept that there should be no statute of limitations for crimes against humanity, thus opening the way with the ratification, by France in 1968, of the Convention of United Nations on the Non-Applicability of Statutory Limitations to War Crimes and Crimes against Humanity.
_	He promoted the concept that public health depended on a clean environment.
_	"Ukiyo" was the concept that life is transitory and nothing worldly lasts forever.
_	Sigmund Freud placed significant value on the vagina, postulating the concept that vaginal orgasm is separate from clitoral orgasm, and that, upon reaching puberty, the proper response of mature women is a changeover to vaginal orgasms (meaning orgasms without any clitoral stimulation).
_	Studies such as these have been around for decades and are mainly centered around the concept that behavioral differences between people with autism and neurotypicals may be observed through a gluten-free diet.
_	As the fall of the Soviet Union appeared imminent, the United States and their allies began to worry about the concept that the nuclear weapons held in smaller countries by the Soviet Union could fall or would fall into enemy hands.
_	Inherent in our understanding of appropriation is the concept that the new work recontextualizes whatever it borrows to create the new work.
_	The right to work is the concept that people have a human right to work, or engage in productive employment, and may not be prevented from doing so.
_	Though there was an investigation, society and law enforcement of the mid-1960s did not accept the concept that a child in a middle-class home could be the target of abuse.
_	It is based on the concept that buying support is normally demonstrated by increased volume and repeated closes in the top half of the daily range and that selling pressure is shown by increased volume and recurrent closes in the lower half of the daily range.
_	It establishes the concept of Portability as a requirement for Enterprise Master Data, and the concept that true Enterprise Master Data is unique to each organization.
_	Like all members of the "as a service" (aaS) family, DaaS builds on the concept that the product (data in this case) can be provided on demand to the user regardless of geographic or organizational separation of provider and consumer.
_	Variegated citizenship represents the concept that those within a different regime or status receive different levels of rights and privileges.
_	Housing First approaches are based on the concept that a homeless individual or household's first and primary need is to obtain stable housing, and that other issues that may affect the household can and should be addressed once housing is obtained.
_	Internet Universality is the concept that "the Internet is much more than infrastructure and applications, it is a network of economic and social interactions and relationships, which has the potential to enable human rights, empower individuals and communities, and facilitate sustainable development.
_	It is based on the idea that modern day citizens are formed by the past and must grasp the concept that the past is still relevant to today's world.
_	Buffon and Johann Blumenbach were believers in monogenism, the concept that all races have a single origin.
_	This viewpoint holds that market timing (i.e. the concept that one can enter the market on the lows and sell on the highs), does not work; attempting such timing gives negative results, at least for small or unsophisticated investors, so it is better for them to simply "buy and hold".
_	In "The Nature and Evolution of Female Sexuality", she introduced the concept that "female sexuality was an insatiable drive that had been repressed for the sake of maintaining a civilized agrarian society" and helped to explain why knowledge of the clitoris had been ignored or forbidden for over three hundred years.
_	Some indigenous nations such as the Chickasaws and the Choctaws began to embrace the concept that African bodies were property, and equated blackness to hereditary inferiority.
_	Hakim defined erotic capital as the concept that an individual's beauty, sexual attractiveness, enhanced social interaction, liveliness, social presentation, sexuality, and fertility can provide opportunities to advance in life.
_	On February 11, Rainbow has revealed their image teaser with the concept that "Elegant".
_	"Robot rights" is the concept that people should have moral obligations towards their machines, similar to human rights or animal rights.
_	Kofoeds School is based on the concept that if people are to be assisted socially, they have to be helped educationally, but the terms education and school are understood in the widest sense, not associated exclusively with narrow vocational qualifications.
_	The Ashram has been promoting the concept that all the tribal groups belong to India and hence are one.
_	This use led him to broaden his original idea into the concept that became the Post-it Note.
_	While Zoroaster's Ormuzd created the universe with his thought, materialist Zurvanism challenged the concept that anything could be made out of nothing.
_	Wilson thereafter began using the term "regulated competition," the concept that Brandeis had developed, and made it the essence of his program.
_	"Meaningful learning" is the concept that learned knowledge (e.g., a fact) is fully understood to the extent that it relates to other knowledge.
_	This appears to contradict the concept that the ancestral molluscan radula was mineralized.
_	The album also garnered numerous mixed reviews that felt that it would only be enjoyed by fans of the franchise; Staples described the tracks as "musical fan fiction ready for both celestial dance floors and distant forgotten landscapes", while Jon Dolan, reviewing for "Rolling Stone" magazine, rated it two and a half stars out of five, feeling that many of the producers involved with the project didn't experiment enough with the concept that it was "hard to get beyond timid fanboy reverence."
_	The roots of historiography in the 19th century are bound up with the concept that history written with a strong connection to the primary sources could be integrated with "the big picture", i.e. to a general, universal history.
_	Constraint theory stipulates that the concept that results from an attempt at conceptual combination is controlled by three constraints known as diagnosticity, plausibility and informativeness.
_	Parwez therefore rejected the principle of "abrogation", part of which is based on the concept that certain hadith can supersede commands of the Quran.
_	New media is the concept that new methods of communicating in the digital world allow smaller groups of people to congregate online and share, sell and swap goods and information.
_	Garfield has stated that two major influences in his creation of "Magic: the Gathering" were the games "Cosmic Encounter", which first used the concept that normal rules could sometimes be overridden, and "Dungeons & Dragons".
_	They praised the film and its challenging the concept that brain activity would decrease when "riding high-speed, vomit-inducing amusement park rides," and concluded that while they were unable to decide their favorite of the seven, they enjoyed how protagonist Dr. Nick Laslowicz "tries to convince us that 'gravity is a mistake' and that brain activity actually increases when a person experiences his terrifyingly impossible park rides.
_	Further confirmation that CDKL5 is an independent disorder with its own characteristics is provided by this study, published in April 2016, which concluded 'There were differences in the presentation of clinical features occurring in the CDKL5 disorder and in Rett syndrome, reinforcing the concept that CDKL5 is an independent disorder with its own distinctive characteristics'.
_	That same year, the Allies established the Nuremberg Code, the first international document to support the concept that "the voluntary consent of the human subject is absolutely essential".
_	James O. Berkland (July 31, 1930 – July 22, 2016) was a California geologist noted for his claims of predicting various earthquakes, including the 1989 Loma Prieta earthquake and 1994 Northridge Earthquake [The Man Who Predicts Earthquakes, pages 103-104] and popularizing the concept that some people are earthquake sensitive.
_	One of the fundamental priniciples of the Convention has been the concept that a driver is always fully in control and responsible for the behavior of a vehicle in traffic.
_	Countries that have subscribed to the convention will need to agree on a new convention, or find other ways of accommodating the concept that a programmed machine may take over some or all of the functions of the driver.
_	However, the drug, while supporting the concept that DP2 contributes to asthmatic disease, did not show sufficient advantage over existing drugs and was discontinued from further development for this application.
_	In cell biology, a unipotent cell is the concept that one stem cell has the capacity to differentiate into only one cell type.
_	I liked Litto's ideas and the concept that the group had for playing.
_	Paschasius believes that life is an opportunity to practice for death; however, the concept that the body is a prison for the soul is practically non-existent in his work, and probably only occurs due to pressure from his peers.
_	This is the concept that there are layers of protection for clinicians and patients to prevent mistakes from occurring.
_	Bohm and Hiley expanded on the concept that "relativistic quantum mechanics can be expressed completely through the interweaving of three basic algebras, the bosonic, the fermionic and the Clifford" and that in this manner "the whole of relativistic quantum mechanics can also be put into an implicate order" as suggested in earlier publications of David Bohm from 1973 and 1980.
_	This season was the last to feature an all-oval tracks schedule, which was part of the concept that led to the creation of the Indy Racing League.
_	The model is based on the concept that the grain size is dependent on the rates at which dislocations are generated and annihilated.
_	Ikebana, as I understand it, is the concept that nature is perfect, but there is just a little bit too much of it.
_	That was the time when the concept that would give life, years later to the Foundation Sobrevivientes, began to take shape.
_	Mars Ravelo (1916-1988), a then young pioneering illustrator from Tanza, Cavite, thought of creating a female counterpart for Superman because he believed in the concept that America is “male” and the Philippines, then a colony of the US, is "female".
_	The title is a reference to Alvin Toffler's Future Shock, the concept that rapid culture changes leave the members of the culture increasingly challenged by adaptation.
_	The party was founded on the concept that Natural Law is the organizing principle that governs the universe and that the problems of humanity are caused by people violating Natural Law.
_	In 2001–02, a trolley car borrowed from Yakima Valley Trolleys was operated along existing, former-freight railroad track to prove the concept that an operating trolley in Issaquah would attract ridership.
_	Internet Universality is the concept that "the Internet is much more than infrastructure and applications, it is a network of economic and social interactions and relationships, which has the potential to enable human rights, empower individuals and communities, and facilitate sustainable development.
_	He argued strongly against the concept that the king had his power through popular consent, and placed Parker in a tradition going back to William of Ockham and Marsilius of Padua.
_	He evolved his philosophy in 1906 into the "Declaration of Principles", the first articulation of the concept that public relations practitioners have a public responsibility that extends beyond obligations to the client.
_	Core to this is the concept that the classes considered for merging do not necessarily represent the final number of classes output, and that altering the number of classes considered for merging directly affects the speed and quality of the final result.
_	Jacobs developed the concept that crime flourishes when people do not meaningfully interact with their neighbors.
_	Other principles which are considered by researchers in social software include the concept that a procedure for fair division should be Pareto optimal, equitable and envy free.
_	At the age of 14, he heard about the Convention on the Rights of the Child (CRC) for the first time and began to organize community initiatives to promote the CRC and the concept that "children should be seen AND heard."
_	For most of the world, the concept that ending deforestation has a direct and profound link to solving the climate crisis is still very much unknown.
_	It defines the concept that if a producer or manufacturer has a product or process that requires inspection and it wishes to postpone the inspection process, it must have a system in place that will insure that the postponed inspection process will take place at some point prior to final product/process acceptance.
_	The Flame is the flame of freedom, as explicitly stated in most of the book endings, and the students act as the guardians of the concept that slavery is evil.
_	Two of the arguments in support of the concept of a "living Constitution" is the concept that the Constitution itself is silent on the matter of constitutional interpretation.
_	Roosevelt was so passionate about the concept that she brought it to the attention of her husband, who decided to place the project under the direction of the United States Department of the Interior.
_	Black explained, "We liked the concept that you could play with what people think and what they're saying, or how they would like to see themselves as opposed to how the audience is seeing them."
_	The second source of opposition is the concept that while Indians are not one nation, neither are the Muslims or Hindus of the subcontinent, and it is instead the relatively homogeneous provincial units of the subcontinent which are true nations and deserving of sovereignty; this view has been presented by the Baloch, Sindhi, and Pashtun sub-nationalities of Pakistan.
_	Model, suggested by Fields, is centered around the concept that decision processes are driven by motivations of highest priority.
_	Perhaps the most influential aspect of Judson's legacy was not the work they produced, but the lens through which they regarded their work, which promoted the concept that anything could be looked at as dance.
_	Animal model studies support the concept that bile acids may play a role in the development of colon cancer.
_	Musa Gasimli denotes in his article: “...for many years in non-scientific theses, the concept that that the US and other Western countries were guilty for the Cold War dominated”.
_	Citizen Diplomacy is the concept that the individual has the right, even the responsibility, to help shape U.S. foreign relations, "one handshake at a time."
_	Although a full-scale prototype of the SpaceCub was never built, the design (and the publicity surrounding the project) brought public attention to the concept that a small vehicle to fly a private pilot into space might be possible, and in that way served to stimulate the X Prize, which adopted the SpaceCub's goal of a 100-km flight altitude as a target for a competition.
_	Perlmutter wrote the book "Grain Brain," released September, 2013, promoting the concept that gluten causes neurological conditions, which became a bestseller.
_	It is based on the concept that all legitimate authority for government comes from the Crown.
_	Honour among thieves is the concept that criminals do not compromise the activities of other criminals (see also Omertà).
_	It is built around the concept that "light is life and darkness is death".
_	The mansion was emblematic of the confidence that the affluent placed in the concept that Columbia Heights represented the ideal suburb.
_	Pre-Soviet Russia shared with other countries the concept that nobility connotes a status or a social category rather than a title.
_	He is credited with the concept that the Glorious Revolution was a constitutional charade that fell short of its ideals.
_	Ruin value () is the concept that a building be designed such that if it eventually collapsed, it would leave behind aesthetically pleasing ruins that would last far longer without any maintenance at all.
_	Social constructionists disregard the concept that emotions are universal.
_	In Neo-Calvinism, sphere sovereignty (Dutch: "souvereiniteit in eigen kring"), also known as differentiated responsibility, is the concept that each sphere (or sector) of life has its own distinct responsibilities and authority or competence, and stands equal to other spheres of life.
_	In France, it was the French Revolutionary penal code (issued in 1791) which for the first time struck down "sodomy" as a crime, decriminalizing it together with all "victimless-crimes" (sodomy, heresy, witchcraft, blasphemy), according with the concept that if there was no victim, there was no crime.
_	Imamate, or belief in the divine guide, is a fundamental belief in the Twelver and Ismaili Shia branches and is based on the concept that God would not leave humanity without access to divine guidance.
_	Carilyn Z. Fuchs and Rehm developed a group administered self-control behavior therapy program based on Rehm's self-control model of depression and the concept that depression results from an individual's deficits in self-control.
_	An example of Lutheran teaching is the concept that man does not find his way to God simply by doing good works, but only through belief ("sola fide").
_	Many euphemisms are used to implicitly stress the concept that homeownership is not the result of a lifetime of effort but a government-given right.
_	He was one of the pioneers of the concept that microbes adhere to surfaces,
_	Another belief was that the Bible was inspired by God which gave rise to the concept that reading it could prophecy future events.
_	A quote from FAO, one of the agencies that developed the concept, is useful for defining it: "Substantial equivalence embodies the concept that if a new food or food component is found to be substantially equivalent to an existing food or food component, it can be treated in the same manner with respect to safety (i.e., the food or food component can be concluded to be as safe as the conventional food or food component)".
_	Nonetheless, the concept that vowel qualities are determined primarily by tongue position and lip rounding continues to be used in pedagogy, as it provides an intuitive explanation of how vowels are distinguished.
_	It took two years to fully involve Americans from the U.S. Embassy in the concept that was dubbed "Mu Ban Samaki" by the Lao.
_	It later presents the work of Nicolaus Copernicus, who advocated the concept that the Earth is not located in the center of the universe.
_	The DPT was unique in NASA’s history in advocating the concept that specific destinations were not terminal venues, but rather should be treated primarily as ‘’stepping stones’’ -- sites for limited testing and demonstration before moving on to other locations of greater interest.
_	Rebirth, or "saṃsāra", is the concept that all life forms go through a cycle of reincarnation, that is a series of births and rebirths.
_	David L. Paulsen has argued that such a belief finds no official backing in statements by church leaders, and that the concept that the heavenly Mother is consigned to a "sacred silence" is largely the result of a relatively recent cultural perception.
_	A premise posited by sex magicians is the concept that sexual energy is a potent force that can be harnessed to transcend one's normally perceived reality.
_	Characteristics of the anti-war movement included opposition to the corporate interests perceived as benefiting from war, to the status quo which was trading the lives of the young for the comforts of those who are older, the concept that those who were drafted were from poor families and would be fighting a war in place of privileged individuals who were able to avoid the draft and military service, and to the lack of input in decision making that those who would die in the conflict would have in deciding to engage in it.
_	has been replaced with the concept that
_	They refuted the concept that to be taken seriously or to be successful, a movement either has to be gender-neutral, or masculine: femininity and motherhood was integral to the Mothers' protest.
_	He sought to formalize developments in thinking about prophetic leadership, the historical basis of the Book of Mormon, and the concept that priesthood authority had been restored in the 1820s and 1830s after centuries of apostasy.
_	Giovanni Gentile's philosophy of actual idealism and Fascism, the concept that people are motivated by ideas and that social change is brought by the leaders.
_	At its heart is the concept that a healthy social environment is essential for adults with developmental disabilities to live productive, independent, and joyful lives.
_	One source of Rodgers's excitement for the concept that became "Me and Juliet" was his view that a contemporary musical gave him the opportunity for a contemporary score.
_	The current study supported the concept that varying cultures use different methods to resolve conflict.
_	This initiative is based on the concept that there is a direct link between food’s production and consumption and the main dilemmas of the contemporary world.
_	The convention enshrined the concept that the state should be sovereign in many matters.
_	"Vigilante justice" is often rationalized by the concept that proper legal forms of criminal punishment are either nonexistent, insufficient, or inefficient.
_	Here Schroeder van der Kolk was influenced by the ideas of Claude François Lallemand and developed his ideas with regards to the etiology of mental illness, particularly the concept that mental illness is a disease than can be treated.
_	The Middle English creole hypothesis is the concept that the English language is a creole, i.e. a language that developed from a pidgin.
_	Their evolutionary and structure-function analyses led to the concept that selective channel-like gates may contribute to substrate specificity.
_	In general, neuroanatomical studies support the concept that autism may involve a combination of brain enlargement in some areas and reduction in others.
_	Due to the concentration of Spanish religious power and authority in the already-established religious orders (the Augustinians, Jesuits and Franciscans to name a few) and the concept that Filipino priests should only stay in the church and not the convent and vice versa (although this was not always followed), the Spanish government banned the new order, especially due to its deviation from original Catholic rituals and teachings, such as prayers and rituals suited for Filipinos.
_	This legislation was based on the concept that the rateable value resulting from an interim valuation shall not exceed the level of rateable value in the valuation list.
_	The video was produced in Hong Kong with the concept that each band member has a twin (a double).
_	In addition, biologist Matthew Parker, after reviewing numerous genetic studies on plant disease resistance, failed to find a single example consistent with the concept that pathogens are the primary selective agent responsible for sexual reproduction in the host.
_	Failure to refer, also reference failure or failure of reference, is the concept that names can fail to name a real object.
_	Foundational to Montanus' teachings was the concept that a human being could be no more than a lyre which the Divine strummed.
_	Last, there is the ideological disposition of a country; the concept that the cultural aspects of women's roles or positions in the places they live dictate where they stand in that society, ultimately either helping or handicapping those women from entering political positions.
_	She expanded on the concept that she could make college game day apparel trendy, fun and multi-purpose.
_	This belief, supported by the concept that God's will controls everything and that no event should be considered truly impossible, is used by local communities to deal with occasional cases of pregnancy in women with absentee husbands, a frequent situation in the modern era due to the large number of males working as immigrant labor in Europe.
_	It encapsulates the concept that these three factors (which might be broadly be glossed as geography, genes, and culture) define Iceland as a nation-state.
_	The Buteyko method is based on the concept that "hidden" or undiagnosed hyperventilation is the underlying cause of numerous medical conditions, including asthma.
_	There are also Kabbalistic reasons for being strict concerning "chalav Yisrael" due to spiritual ramifications relating to the concept that drinking non-"chalav Yisrael" leads to ""timtum ha-lev"", a spiritual deadening of the heart.
_	The philosophy presents the concept that humans have evolved into a unique species that is essentially exploring, creative, nurturing, and highly cooperative.
_	Much like Wolmans case model for a hypothetical American City, this method is based on the concept that the mass of the resources used will equal the mass "plus" stock changes out.
_	Praised by Dr. W. Edwards Deming (the business guru of the 1980s American quality movement), it made clear the concept that quality does not suddenly plummet when, for instance, a machinist exceeds a rigid blueprint tolerance.
_	He thus supports his argument highly criticizing the concept that Americanization is occurring through global overflow of American television products.
_	He also doubts the concept that cultural agents are passive receivers of information.
_	Throughout his career he has promoted the concept that a not-for-profit organization is a mission-based business, in the business of doing its mission.
_	The second purpose of the woman's film, according to Basinger, is "to reaffirm in the end the concept that a woman's true job is that of being a woman".
_	Tiwari says that "Inner Medicine Healing is based on the concept that each one of us has the ability to heal ourselves."
_	The early Buddhist texts suggest that Buddha faced a difficulty in explaining what is reborn and how rebirth occurs, after he innovated the concept that there is "no self" ("Anatta").
_	This followed the concept that GAD autoantibodies were a feature of type 1 diabetes and not type 2 diabetes.
_	The show was based on the concept that the "real" show has been halted, so Ray and Ed take over and fill the time so the audience still have a show to watch.
_	His 1986 Ph.D. thesis explored the concept that the term structure of interest rates (difference between long-term interest rates and short-term rates) could predict the US business cycle.
_	Core to any statistical analysis is the concept that measurements vary: they have both a central tendency, or mean, and a spread around this central value, or variance.
_	Following the Franco-Prussian war of 1870-71 and the passing of control to Germany, German writers developed the concept that the altarpiece somehow represented the essential character of the German nation.
_	For a less extreme example, consider how movies usually end with the bad being punished, humiliated, or otherwise failing, thus affirming for viewers the concept that the good end happily and the bad unhappily, a narrative which implies that the status quo and established power structures are largely legitimate.
_	Chronometry is based on the concept that the composition of the nuclear material changes as samples are prepared and analyzed.
_	TOPSIS is based on the concept that the chosen alternative should have the shortest geometric distance from the positive ideal solution (PIS) and the longest geometric distance from the negative ideal solution (NIS).
_	Until the adoption of the first of these constitutions, the concepts of Ethiopian government had been codified in the "Kebra Nagast" (which presented the concept that the legitimacy of the Emperor of Ethiopia was based on its asserted descent from king Solomon of ancient Israel), and the "Fetha Negest" (a legal code used in Ethiopia at least as early as 1450 to define the rights and responsibilities of the monarch and subjects, as defined by the Ethiopian Orthodox Tewahedo Church).
_	Marx believed that the capitalist bourgeois and their economists were promoting what he saw as the lie that "the interests of the capitalist and of the worker are ... one and the same", therefore he believed that they did this by purporting the concept that "the fastest possible growth of productive capital" was best not only for the wealthy capitalists but also for the workers because it provided them with employment.
_	The first scientists to discuss the concept that names had a determining effect were early 20th-century German psychologists.
_	This corroborates the concept that a lowered availability of free fatty acids affects glucose metabolism by PDH complex regulation.
_	Both size classes lived alongside each other, and while researchers had previously suggested that they represent different species, Christopher Bennett showed that the differences between them are consistent with the concept that they represent females and males, and that "Geosternbergia" species were sexually dimorphic.
_	She published a magazine, "Shekinah", often rendered "SHEkinah", in which she explored the concept that the Shekhinah is the Holy Spirit.
_	The famous American Telephone & Telegraph (AT&T) empire was once based on the concept that they had the duty and honor of serving the public people in return for their monopoly on the telecommunication industry.
_	The notion of intersectionality in work-life balance encompasses the concept that oppression includes various elements of self-identity that are interrelated
_	The label was named after the concept that it is logical for acts to be psychotic.
_	In an article on Kotaku, Gamasutra's Leigh Alexander used Ivy as a primary example of video game representations of the ideal male and female versus the real world and the concept that "sex sells", noting the unconscious appeal of such a character to represent oneself as in a game.
_	While snus is not likely to become a legal or indeed politically viable option in the UK, this data proves the concept that harm reduction strategies can contribute to significant reductions in smoking prevalence."
_	Making the songs based on the concept that "places can be haunted by meaning," Wilkinson mentally went into both real and fantasy places when producing the tracks.
_	The proto-Cubists revolted against the concept that objective beauty was central to the definition of art.
_	Ghazala coined the term "immediate canvas" in his work with circuit bending, which is the concept that through circuit bending the hurdles of electronic design are avoided.
_	New Appalachia is the concept that the quality of life in the San Joaquin Valley of California is comparable or worse than the traditionally impoverished Appalachia region of the Appalachian Mountains and therefore shares similar hardships.
_	Results were all consistent with the concept that taut bands are detectable and quantifiable with MRE imaging.
_	In logic and mathematics, inclusion is the concept that all the contents of one object are also contained within a second object.
_	However, the concept that all Late Cretaceous North American troodontids belong to one species began to be questioned soon after Currie's 1987 paper was published, including by Currie himself.
_	Among the 28 stories, other notable tales include one about the influence of Madonna (with discourse including "Any American woman under 40 who says she's never dressed as Madonna is either lying or Amish."); one about dressing room anxiety (a story revolving around the concept that "I'm an 8.
_	Many early stories about black holes incorporate the concept that a black hole may contain a wormhole (known earlier as an "Einstein-Rosen bridge") that could be used for transportation; a concept that was at one time considered plausible, but is not currently accepted.
_	It assigns relative scores to all nodes in the network based on the concept that connections to high-scoring nodes contribute more to the score of the node in question than equal connections to low-scoring nodes.
_	Although the show's premise features the concept that Khan has only $35 to spend, there are times where he does break the budget.
_	Such models are based on the concept that during plastic deformation, microvoids nucleate and grow until a local plastic neck or fracture of the intervoid matrix occurs, which causes the coalescence of neighbouring voids.
_	Interested in what holds societies together, he proposed the concept that the earliest human domestic institution was the matrilineal clan, not the patriarchal family.
_	We must not lock ourselves into the concept that the proposed organization need be a Party in the traditional sense.
_	This program is based on the concept that young people are the key to the future and are making a difference in the world.
_	Influences from the Biblical Book of Revelation are also seen in the concept that the earth has a predestined day of ending.
_	In his second book, Pérez Fernández intends to demonstrate the importance of the African contribution to the integration of the music of Mexico, as well as to provide facts that may support, within the musicological field, the conclusions of Mexican anthropologist Gonzalo Aguirre Beltrán in reference to the concept that the Mexican creole music is fundamentally a result of the cultural fusion between the Spanish and the African population.
_	The Constitution did not use the word "equality", yet Lincoln believed that the concept that "all men are created equal" remained a part of the nation's founding principles.
_	Their purpose was to illustrate the concept that the world is a sphere with 5 climate zones:
_	BC Epicurus proposed the concept that randomness exists by itself, independent of human knowledge.
_	In 1967, the Supreme Court of the United States ruled in In re Gault that children were entitled to Constitutional recognition, and the concept that they are developmentally distinct from adults was recently recognized in Miller v. Alabama, however, the broader issue of the legal status of children as "persons" in the U.S. Constitution and the nexus with the rights and responsibilities of parents continues to be analyzed by legal scholars.
_	Phonetotopy is the concept that articulatory features as well as perceptual features of speech sounds are ordered in the brain in a similar way as tone (tonotopy), articulation and its somatosensory feedback (somatotopy), or visual location of an object (retinotopy).
_	In economics, free contract is the concept that people may decide what agreements they want to enter into.
_	As a child, Bevis was scared of wrestling because of the injuries her family received and the concept that her parents fought other people for a living.
_	Adaptive management is based on the concept that predicting future influences/disturbance to an ecosystem is limited and unclear.
_	Perspective projection utilizes the concept that if the distance between the observer and model increases, the model appears smaller than before.
_	A key point of manifesto is the concept that in order to elevate women from second class position, women should be willing to consider other women as sexual partners.
_	The artist's diagram was largely based on the concept that , with an absolute magnitude (H) of 3.4, may have an albedo around 0.08, which resulted in an overly optimistic diameter estimate of around .
_	Dwyer told "The Guardian", "the most serious issue was the spreading of the concept that homeopathic vaccinations were harmless and just as good as orthodox vaccinations.
_	New antisemitism is the concept that a new form of antisemitism has developed in the late 20th and early 21st centuries, emanating simultaneously from the far-left, Islamism, and the far-right, and that it tends to manifest itself as opposition to Zionism and the State of Israel.
_	The work as a whole treats the theme of inspired melancholy, the concept that "melecholia" is not merely a negative state, but rather allows for deep and searching thought, self-examination, and study of the world.
_	"Halo" was taken from a different disc of "I Am... Sasha Fierce" to "Diva"; the intention was to demonstrate the concept that Beyoncé has conflicting personalities—the central theme of the album.
_	At the time the concept that labouring in the tropics was unhealthy for Europeans had widespread currency.
_	Beard's main thesis was that the U.S. Constitution "was essentially an economic document based upon the concept that the fundamental private rights of property are anterior to government and morally beyond the reach of popular majorities."
_	Pitchfork, who are normally favourable to Argos' main band Art Brut stated that it was "for obsessives only", and of the concept that, "a mildly amusing Myspace click can lead to a painfully obnoxious album."
_	Built in 1995 and rebuilt in 2004, the Schnaper Garden is a restorative garden, advancing the concept that "properly planned and operated gardens can reduce stress and encourage a sense of well being for long-term health care patients."
_	The people who continued with Ethereum Classic advocate for blockchain immutability, and the concept that "code is law" against the pro-fork side (Ethereum) which largely argued for extra-protocol intentionality, decentralized decision-making, and conflict resolution.
_	Process theology is compatible with panentheism, the concept that God contains the universe (pantheism) but also transcends it.
_	It derives from the concept that the change in appearance and functionality caused by a non-silent mutation will generally stand out in a population.
_	Since its start in 2004, the Afisha Picnic has followed the concept that mixes professional music festival featuring performances of international artists and local independent musicians, and urban-style event with all sorts of entertainment, such as designers’ market, gastronomic area, games and crafts, sports and amusements, lectures and workshops, and, on one occasion, even a dance floor on the rollerdrome.
_	Laffer is best known for the Laffer curve, an illustration of the concept that there exists some tax rate between 0% and 100% that will result in maximum tax revenue for governments.
_	The agency uses an acorn as its symbol, representing the concept that ideas can develop into business-changing forces.
_	John Storck, a former instructor of the American Management Association's "Basic Project Management" course, used a pair of triangles called triangle outer and triangle inner to represent the concept that the intent of a project is to complete on or before the allowed time, on or under budget, and to meet or exceed the required scope.
_	Sculptor Jeffrey Rubinoff has advanced the concept that we now live in a period after the End of the Age of Agriculture:
_	The results of this experiment support the concept that the most specialized soldier phenotype in "Cephalotes" is a result of adaptation to ecological specialization within a narrow subset of available nests
_	The idea of this metaphor lies in the concept that when we see a politician or a public activist on the TV we see not a real person but rather an image created for the certain purpose whether to capture attention, rouse empathy or simply improve the rating of a political party or any other organization.
_	Growing evidence supports the concept that deficits in axonal transport contributes to pathogenesis in multiple neurodegenerative diseases.
_	"The Pin Drop" addresses "the concept that you can be with someone because it’s comfortable and convenient, not because there’s any love or empathy."
_	In modern terminology, the concept that salient, bizarre, shocking, or simply unusual information will be more easily remembered can be referred to as the Von Restorff effect.
_	One teachers' manual suggests playing this game as a way to introduce children to the concept that 0 is divisible by 2.
_	Louis’ role as Emperor carried with it the ecclesiastical basis for universal power; the concept that one of the Emperors duties was to protect the Church against dangers which might threaten its ability to correctly teach and spread the faith.
_	The song defined the concept that there is polarity between being positive or being negative, specifically noting there is also no neutral as in "no more Mr. In-Between".
_	During the Vietnam War, the concept that all future wars would be nuclear was turned on its head, and the "big belly" modifications increased the B-52's total bomb load to , turning it into a powerful tactical aircraft which could be used against ground troops along with strategic targets from high altitudes.
_	The church building has many symbolic meanings; perhaps the oldest and most prominent is the concept that the Church is the Ark of Salvation (as in Noah's Ark) in which the world is saved from the flood of temptations.
_	A fourth trait is the characterisation of divinity as a "life force", the essence of which is creativity, while a fifth is the concept that divinity consists of love.
_	At the core of Yeomans’ beliefs was the concept that children learn best through experience.
_	Mentioning an unperson's name, or even speaking of their past existence, is itself thoughtcrime; the concept that the person may have existed at one time and has disappeared cannot be expressed in Newspeak.
_	In the United States of America, Reform Judaism rejects the concept that any rules or rituals should be considered necessary for conversion to Judaism.
_	Others associate it with the sephirah Chesed and Geburah (mercy and strength) which are intimately associated with morality and the concept that both expansion, as expressed by Chesed, and limitation, as expressed by Geburah, are necessary for the creation of individual beings.
_	The objective correlative concept that Eliot popularised in this essay refers to the concept that the only way to express an emotion through art is to find "a set of objects, a situation, [or] a chain of events" that will, when read or performed, evoke a specific sensory experience in the audience.
_	Spiritualism was based on the concept that individuals could communicate with spirits of the deceased during séances.
_	The use of viral marketing is shifting from the concept that the content drives its own attention to the intended attempt to draw the attention.
_	A helen is a humorous unit of measurement based on the concept that Helen of Troy, from the "Iliad", had a "face that launched a thousand ships".
_	William Odom, former Chairman and CEO of Ford Motor Credit Company, is credited with the concept that led to formation of the Jump$tart Coalition in 1995.
_	Here the Pope dwells at length on the concept that rights must be linked to duties and that the latter should take precedence over the former.
_	Darwin rejected both the idea that races had been separately created, and the concept that races had evolved in parallel from separate ancestral species of apes.
_	The authors, in fact, stress the concept that at the beginning of the game the forces stand in equilibrium.
_	The book begins with an introduction in which Lazreg had outlined her previously published statements, in which she criticized the ideas that women needed to be rescued from the veil or Muslim men, and she criticized the concept that Islam oppresses women.
_	Ravelo, a then young pioneering illustrator from Tanza, Cavite, thought of creating a female counterpart for Superman because he believed in the concept that the US is “male” and the Philippines is “female.”
_	It was the concept that enabled Red Hat to build Linux distributions faster and more reliably than had been possible previously.
_	He promoted the concept that the Church in India should be Indian.
_	Drive theory grows out of the concept that people have certain biological drives, such as hunger and thirst.
_	The idea for the novel arose when he combined this idea with the concept that the hyperdrive would emerge as a byproduct of other research, in this case military research into superweapon technology.
_	Khmer Rouge theory developed the concept that the nation should take "agriculture as the basic factor and use the fruits of agriculture to build industry".
_	"Pressed" refers to the concept that the olives are crushed in a mill to extract the oil.
_	While no-one can say Tūtānekai and Tiki were sexually involved, their relationship was accepted to be intimate beyond mere friendship, and the story illustrates the concept that "takatāpui" in traditional Māori life was not exactly the same as constructions of contemporary homosexuality in Western societies.
_	James has explained the effort will emphasize the concept that everyone "has a place in this world because we're all human and one day we'll find that place through love and acceptance."
_	Peak wheat is the concept that agricultural production, due to its high use of water and energy inputs, is subject to the same profile as oil and other fossil fuel production.
_	The concept of self-determined freedom was also a direct challenge to the concept that whites should rule and to the institution of slavery.
_	Research using this radar led to the concept that would later go on to become the NWS NEXRAD WSR-88D radar network.
_	Willke was a proponent of the concept that female rape victims have physiologic defenses against pregnancy, and thus that women rarely become pregnant after a sexual assault.
_	This work also highlights the connection to the concept that science is an ongoing process of understanding knowledge that develops alongside new discoveries and ideas.
_	IdMOC technology is based on the concept that multiple organs signal or communicate via the systemic circulation (i.e., blood).
_	Similarly, the concept that (as per Genesis 3:16) the pains of childbirth are a punishment for Eve's sin is alien to the Qur'an.
_	He theorized that the spatial and functional errors were due to the concept that one’s knowledge of one’s body is stored apart from other knowledge.
_	The 1835 proclamation by Governor Richard Bourke implemented the doctrine of ""terra nullius"" upon which British settlement was based, reinforcing the concept that there was no prior land owner to British possession and that Aboriginal people could not sell or assign the land, and individuals could only acquire it through distribution by the Crown.
_	Internet Universality is the concept that "the Internet is much more than infrastructure and applications, it is a network of economic and social interactions and relationships, which has the potential to enable Human rights, empower individuals and communities, and facilitate sustainable development.
_	The marketing campaign focuses on the concept that the cost of a Christmas tree is around the same cost of giving someone shelter, food and support.
_	This reflects the concept that donning a garment with tzitzit reminds its wearer of all Torah commandments.
_	The project built out a five-person team and a variety of councils of prominent Americans to advance the concept that a year or more of national service should become a common opportunity and expectation for young Americans.
_	Toei producer Takahito Ōmori commented on the lack of a yellow warrior in the series, something that has not happened since "Dengeki Sentai Changeman", by noting that the color yellow has become associated with females for the modern generation of viewers and thus would not be able to properly portray the brutish strength a male character is capable of portraying to match with the concept that the characters beat their dinosaur partners in battle.
_	The European Union defines CSR as "...the concept that an enterprise is accountable for its impact on all relevant stakeholders.
_	Lucas had had an idea for a long time "based on the concept that we live in the future and that you could make a futuristic film using existing stuff".
_	It is closely related to the notion of personal space, the concept that individuals have ownership of their immediate surroundings; and for others to invade this space represents an infringement on their privacy.
_	"Rolling Stone"s Peter Travers said the film is "too much of a good thing" and wrote, "The Russo brothers have clearly never learned the concept that less is more.
_	This is the concept that the cultural representations generated with the us-and-them binary relation are social constructs, which are mutually constitutive and cannot exist independent of each other, because each exists on account of and for the other.
_	In this respect public participation may challenge the concept that "big is better" and the logic of centralized
_	Valentine v. United States, 299 U.S. 5 (1936), is known in the study of international criminal law for its contribution to the concept that while it is permissible for the United States to receive an accused without a treaty-based extradition, the United States itself will not extradite without authority found in statute or treaty.
_	Thus, it seemed quite logical to promote the group as "Captain Beefheart and his Magic Band", around the concept that Captain Beefheart had "magic powers" and, upon drinking a Pepsi, could summon up "His Magic Band" to appear and perform behind him.
_	Although eventually most of Libeskind's plan was to be ignored, it established two concepts that will define the Pataki legacy at Ground Zero – the placement (and name) of the high Freedom Tower and the concept that the memorial be below street level.
_	It was adopted by emerging social sciences to support the concept that non-European societies were "primitive" in an early stage of development towards the European ideal, but since then it has been heavily refuted on many fronts Haeckel's works led to the formation of the Monist League in 1904 with many prominent citizens among its members, including the Nobel Prize winner Wilhelm Ostwald.
_	Sub City (Hopeless Records' non-profit 501(c) organization) announced on November 9, 2012 that The Used, with support from We Came As Romans, Crown The Empire, and Mindflow, will headline the annual nationwide charity tour will circle the US through February, showcasing some of the best bands in music today while raising funds and awareness for It Gets Better Project and the concept that we can all help play a part in making a positive impact.
_	The belief of the necessity of spilled blood and death to make restitution for adultery and murder was aided by a generally favorable view toward capital punishment, the idea that spilled blood "cries out" for retribution, the "blood for blood" doctrine that says crimes of bloodshed should be punished by the spilling of blood, and the concept that repentance requires restitution.
_	In corporate finance, Structural subordination is the concept that a lender to a company will not have access to the assets of the company's subsidiary until after all of the subsidiary's creditors have been paid and the remaining assets have been distributed up to the company as an equity holder.
_	In the 17th century, Hugo Grotius put forward the concept that everyone has 'sovereign authority' over themselves but that they could alienate that natural right to the common good, an early social contract theory.
_	While productive forces are a "human" activity, the concept of "productive forces" includes the concept that technology mediates the human-nature relationship.
_	Phrenology () is a pseudomedicine primarily focused on measurements of the human skull, based on the concept that the brain is the organ of the mind, and that certain brain areas have localized, specific functions or modules.
_	For Haeckel, language specifically represented the concept that all phenomena of human development relate to the laws of biology.
_	Relative scores are assigned to all nodes in the network based on the concept that connections to high-scoring nodes contribute more to the score of the node in question than equal connections to low-scoring nodes.
_	He directed and as well as acted in such films which tried to reject the concept that homosexual relationship is all about a physical relationship.
_	Several writers, including Eva Cox and Adele Horin, rejected the concept that Leigh was in any way responsible for her sexual assault and murder.
_	The model is based on the concept that in order for a scientific-technological system to exist in practice it is necessary for three sectors to be strongly linked together over the long term: the State (which formulates and implements policy); the scientific and technological infrastructure (which provides technology); and the productive sector (which uses technology).
_	He created a 45-page writing guide, and proposed several story ideas based on the concept that pockets of civilisation had regressed to past eras or changed altogether.
_	The regulation of prostitution in Europe ("Regulationism") was closely tied to the concept that prostitution was a source of venereal disease, requiring medical supervision.
_	In 1973, he proved this conjecture false, though the concept that image textures could be modeled based on low-order statistics remained.
_	Schopenhauer used the word "will" as a human's most familiar designation for the concept that can also be signified by other words such as "desire," "striving," "wanting," "effort," and "urging."
_	Russo came up with the concept that they would be the recently dead only, because they could not afford to bring long-dead people out of their graves, or at least "we" thought.
_	The book introduces "The Land of Wallies" and the concept that Wally is just one of many Wallies.
_	Most of this ideology agrees with the concept that with mindful awareness of the higher self, peace, salvation, or enlightenment may be procured.
_	The find bolsters the concept that metalworking developed from multiple independent technologies that were focused on native materials.
_	While snus is not likely to become a legal or indeed politically viable option in the UK, this data proves the concept that harm reduction strategies can contribute to significant reductions in smoking prevalence."
_	Coronations in Asia in the strict sense are and historically were rare, as only few monarchies, primarily in Western Asia, ever adopted the concept that the placement of a crown symbolised the monarch's investiture.
_	To create the selection, Lapis first determines the more salient properties of the items selected by the user in a process called "feature generation", detects common features of the user-selected items, groups these features to create a hypotheses for the concept that defines the selection, and then applies the generalized concept to the whole text.
_	It is the concept that existence moves towards Spiritual oneness, but remains plural.
_	In a Canadian context, the concept that political blogging has become a more essential part of the political process the more Canada as a nation has become enmeshed in digital culture can be seen in recent data from the Canadian Media Research Consortium.
_	The reconstruction of SB transposase was based on the concept that there was a primordial Tc1-like transposon that was the ancestor to the sequences found in fish genomes.
_	In a series or articles that were later published in his book "The Rebbe, the Messiah, and the Scandal of Orthodox Indifference", Berger argued that there is no source in Jewish theology for the concept that a Messiah will come, begin his mission, only to die, and then be resurrected to complete his mission.
_	During this period he supported the concept that the large feudal estates (called cifliks during the period) of the region should be expropriated and redistributed to those who owned no land.
_	This naive idea arises, as do so many other wrong beliefs about primary care, because of the concept that doctors take care of diseases.
_	It was conceived from the concept that human civilization owes its existence to religious and philosophical truth.
_	The judges of the court cited existing statutes—including particularly a 1351 statute, "De Natis Ultra Mare", which granted the benefits of subject status to foreign-born children of the king's subjects—as supporting the concept that allegiance was tied to the person of the king, rather than to the kingdom itself or to its laws.
_	The Súper Comando character was created from Gustavo's desire to go to Military School he came up with the concept that incorporated a military theme in his mask and tights.
_	In 2017, exploring the concept that reality consists of both ontologically real "Possibles" (Res potentia) and ontologically real "Actuals" (Res extensa), Kauffman co-authored, with Ruth Kastner and Michael Epperson:
_	He also contributed to pioneer the concept that leptin has pro-cognitive effects in humans.
_	He was also an early proponent of the concept that a hypothesis must be proved by experiments based on confirmable procedures or mathematical evidence—hence understanding the scientific method five centuries before Renaissance scientists.
_	Many times an important part of preparation is the concept that time is of the essence and applies especially to contract law.
_	Their plan was based on the concept that a species is not extinct as long as all its genes are still present in a living population.
_	It is based on the concept that communication can only take place at the right time and under the right circumstances".
_	He is so dedicated to the concept that when his son Wittypate Oldcraft turns twenty-one, Sir Perfidious kicks him out of the family manse with no income, to live by his wits.
_	The stigma of print is the concept that an informal social convention restricted the literary works of aristocrats in the Tudor and Jacobean age to private and courtly audiences — as opposed to commercial endeavors — at the risk of social disgrace if violated, and which obliged the author to profess an abhorrence of the press and to restrict his works from publication.
_	It is based on the concept that a blast shock load is essentially a high-pressure front that moves out radially and decays very quickly - because blast falloff is thus often more exponential than linear (indeed radial - any given explosive must cover a circular-shaped area but blast power generally only increases linearly with explosive strength), any standoff distance helps increases survival chances for passersby and minimizes danger, though shrapnel mitigates this effect if present.
_	For the album, the band embraced the concept that "it's up to us to decide what Taking Back Sunday sounds like.
_	Fisher's body of work is based on the concept that people are essentially storytellers, referred to as narrative theory.
_	Among the many Defender projects were several studies based on the concept that a re-entering nuclear warhead would cause unique physical signatures while still in the upper atmosphere.
_	This holds true with the concept that western people are more concerned with their own rights, whilst eastern civilization focuses more on their duties to the state.
_	It could be said that East Asia promotes the concept that individual independences may need to be sacrificed in order for the country to maintain a state of prosperity and order.
_	Then building on the concept that "the common love of truth unites people, the common love of Christ unites all Christians," Augustine taught that faith in Christ implies community in the Church, and that the goal of Christians should be the unity of mankind.
_	Scott Brody pioneered the concept that summer camps could be a solution for the widening employment skills gap in the American workforce.
_	Video and audio captured from the physical world are used to reinforce the concept that participants are experiencing a nonfiction story.
_	The nihilist contribution to socialism in general was the concept that the peasant was an agent of social change (Chernyshevsky, A Criticism of Philosophical Prejudices Against the Obshchina (1858)), and not just the bourgeois reformers of the revolutions of 1848, or the proletariat of Marx (a concept that wouldn't reach Russia until later).
_	My contribution was to take out the moving parts and make the thing entirely electronic, and that was the concept that I had when I was just a freshman in high school in the Spring of 1921 at age 14."
_	From 1913 to present, the concept that scleroderma is not closely related to LS also starts being formed.
_	Barry so as to undermine the concept that a transgender man could have achieved as much as Barry did.
_	She supported the concept that abortion is a woman's choice, that it shouldn't be a crime or exclusively a doctor's choice or anyone else involved, and helped form NARAL (now NARAL Pro-Choice America) at a time when Planned Parenthood wasn't yet supportive.
_	The explanatory note states that the theme of the book explores the concept that we all work for a particular reward.
_	The song is described as a karmic way of seeing things from the concept that everything returns.
_	He rejected the concept that the state of a physical system depends on the experimental arrangement for its measurement.
_	Robert Macfarlane discusses the painting in terms of its significant influence on how mountain climbing has been viewed in the Western world since the Romantic era, calling it the "archetypical image of the mountain-climbing visionary", and describing its power in representing the concept that standing on mountain tops is something to be admired, an idea which barely existed in earlier centuries.
_	Though some research shows that stiffer tumors are indicative of increased metastasis and decreased survival (which contradicts the concept that durotactic cells should be more attracted to the tumor and metastasize less), this is not counter intuitive because collagen-dependent integrin signaling has a wide range of consequences beyond durotaxis, including inhibition of the tumor suppressor PTEN via upregulation of the miRNA miR-18a.
_	Combining the two gives the concept that "women's special role as mother gives her the duty and the right to participate in the public sphere."
_	"If you had a pirate concept that had failed for five years and had a new concept, would you go back to the concept that failed for five years or try something new?("We like pirates",they said)
_	One Health is the concept that health in animals, people, and the environment is interrelated; that is, the health of each contributes to the health of all.
_	As the designs for the individual types evolved, intricate details of the actual diving suit were worked out piece by piece, using the concept that the suits would be constructed from salvaged parts of the city.
_	Coining of the term "consolidation" is credited to the German researchers Müller and Alfons Pilzecker who rediscovered the concept that memory takes time to fixate or undergo "Konsolidierung" in their studies conducted between 1892 and 1900.
_	For advice on economic policy, Wilson frequently sought out Louis D. Brandeis, who promoted the concept that corporate trusts be regulated by the government.
_	I think that the concept that the enemy will see these films and use it as motivation is total nonsense.
_	"This idea of synthesis is grounded in the concept that certain scientific and philosophical developments have transformed the human psyche to such an extent that traditional "static" art forms and the differentiation of artistic disciplines have become obsolete.
_	Central to the Aristotelian approach is the concept that motion will always precede motion, or in other words, a force will always create another force, and therefore for a force to be created, another force must act upon that force.
_	Also known as academic racism, such theories first needed to overcome the Church's resistance to positivist accounts of history and its support of monogenism, the concept that all human beings were originated from the same ancestors, in accordance with creationist accounts of history.
_	This is important, secondarily, because the entire illusion of a commercially driven media system is premised on the concept that advertising sells products.
_	This reflects the concept that donning a garment with "tzitzyot" reminds its wearer of all Torah commandments, as specified in Numbers 15:39.
_	Message discipline is the concept that politicians and other public policy advocates should talk about what is relevant to achieve their aims, and not allow themselves to be sidetracked either by their own thoughts or the questions of press or audience.
_	The philosophy of S.T.E.A.M. revolves around the concept that science and technology are illustrated through engineering and the arts, all supported by mathematical elements.
_	There is naturally some debate on the accuracy of PVAs, since a wide variety of assumptions generally are required for future forecasting; however, the important consideration is not absolute accuracy, but promulgation of the concept that each species indeed has an MVP, which at least can be approximated for the sake of conservation biology and Biodiversity Action Plans.
_	He includes incidents wherein one becomes lost and accidentally retraces one's steps, and instances wherein random numbers recur, seemingly meaningfully (here Freud may be said to be prefiguring the concept that Jung would later refer to as synchronicity).
_	Popularized by the American sociologist Barry Glassner, culture of fear (or climate of fear) is the concept that people may incite fear in the general public to achieve political or workplace goals through emotional bias.
_	It was met with especially harsh criticism by the Roman Catholic Church for the accusation that it is behind a two-thousand-year-old cover-up concerning what the Holy Grail really is and the concept that Jesus Christ and Mary Magdalene were married and that the union produced a daughter, and for its treatment of the organizations Priory of Sion and Opus Dei.
_	For instance, in practice, Abstract Expressionism was influenced by Dada by the fact that the art form had its similarities not in the way that the art was constructed, but rather from the concept that the genres exemplify.
_	The French naturalist Georges-Louis Leclerc, Comte de Buffon (1707–1788) and the German anatomist Johann Blumenbach (1752–1840) were believers in monogenism, the concept that all races have a single origin.
_	In the 18th century, the concept that the age of the Earth was millions, if not billions, of years began to appear.
_	Most notably, MDB Communications CCO, Richard Coad is the person credited with the architecture, strategy and creation of the concept that brought the Subway Restaurants to national prominence.
_	Heaven as a physical place survived in the concept that it was located far out into space, and that the stars were "lights shining through from heaven".
_	These equations do not require a preexisting space-time, making it possible to realize the concept that space-time and all structures therein arise as a result of the collective interaction of the sea states with each other and with the additional particles and "holes" in the sea.
_	Members of the group call themselves Allah's Five Percenters, which reflects the concept that ten percent of the people in the world know the truth of existence, and those elites and agents opt to keep eighty-five percent of the world in ignorance and under their controlling thumb; the remaining five percent are those who know the truth and are determined to enlighten the rest.
_	Shirin's further teachings include the idea of a Law of Life, the concept that storytelling may be a genetic characteristic of humans, the promotion of animism, and the notion that totalitarian agriculture results in ecological imbalance and over-population, which themselves are rapidly leading to humankind's self-destruction.
_	Confabulation is used to select the expectancy of the concept that follows a particular context.
_	The ISC website characterizes its membership as "committed to advancing the concept that multiple competing software markets should be allowed to develop and flourish unimpeded by government preference or mandate".
_	These programs increased the exposure of the flag and the concept that it was part of the national identity.
_	The caste system among the Mandara people integrated the concept that the strata have innate pollution and therefore they are stigmatized, however there is no evidence that their Islamic belief integrated the differences between the socially differentiated castes in their society to have been divinely sanctioned.
_	Maimonides' thirteen principles of faith includes the concept that God has no body and that physical concepts do not apply to Him.
_	Slab pull is the concept that plate motion is driven by the weight of cool, dense plates and that heavier plates will begin to subduct.
_	With adult readers far outnumbering juveniles, "Li'l Abner" forever cleared away the concept that humor strips were solely the domain of adolescents and children.
_	In this optic, they decided to mobilize it for war duties, under the concept that every fascist was to be first of all a combatant, and had to take arms for the defense of Italy and fascism.
_	In June 2017, director Michael Bay discussed his idea for a follow-up to "The Rock" that never developed past the concept that Mason is chased by the government after escaping.
_	In parallel, the concept that all men, whether Greek or barbarian, belonged to the same race was being developed by the Sophists and thus that certain men were slaves although they had the soul of a freeman and vice versa.
_	Justice Blackmun's dissent focussed on the concept that applying promissory estoppel punished the publication of truth.
_	In spite of the criticisms of the way in which the rule in "Dearle v Hall" has developed, there is much to be said for the concept that the priority of assignments or charges over debts should, as a general rule, depend on the date notice is given to the person who owes the debt.
_	He also advanced in 1931 the concept that became known as the multiplier, a coefficient showing the effect of a change in total national investment on the amount of total national income.
_	The campaign consisted of TV adverts, calendar and phone card designs, using the concept that a phone enables a person to travel free in nature and still keep in touch.
_	Time Ace is based on the concept that an eccentric inventor from 1914, Dr. Hugo Clock, has formed a plan to travel forward in time to end World War I, but the evil Dr. Klaus Scythe uses the time machine to further his own plan for world domination.
_	Internet universality is the concept that "the Internet is much more than infrastructure and applications, it is a network of economic and social interactions and relationships, which has the potential to enable human rights, empower individuals and communities, and facilitate sustainable development.
_	The name referred to the concept that the system would be so accurate and free from the effects of mechanical shocks and jarring that it would not require any other form of "fixing" in flight.
_	He was the first president to reject containment and detente and to put into practice the concept that the Soviet Union could be defeated rather than simply negotiated with, a post-Détente strategy, a conviction that was vindicated by Gennadi Gerasimov, the Foreign Ministry spokesman under Gorbachev, who said that the Strategic Defense Initiative was "very successful blackmail.
_	Sexual fluidity is the concept that sexual orientation or sexuality is not rigid, but rather can change over time.
_	This campaign setting combines aspects of the previous two settings ("Shadow Chasers" & "Agents of Psi") and uses the concept that all three settings coexist in the same reality (at least in "Urban Arcana").
_	Lamarckism, the concept that an organism can pass on characteristics that it acquired during its lifetime to its offspring (also known as inheritance of acquired characteristics or soft inheritance) incorporated two common ideas of its time:
_	This view stresses experience that other apologists have not made as explicit, and in the end, the concept that the Holy Spirit convinces the heart of truth becomes the central theme of the apologetic argument.
_	Instead, producers added the concept that Jennifer's nickname was taken from her real last name, Juggston.
_	The term computer insecurity, on the other hand, is the concept that computer systems are inherently vulnerable to attack, and therefore an evolving arms race between those who exploit existing vulnerabilities in security systems and those who must then engineer new mechanisms of security.
_	Cramer came up with the concept that reverberation or reverb would give the AM signal a sound of more depth.
_	The early Buddhist texts suggest that Buddha faced a difficulty in explaining what is reborn and how rebirth occurs, after he innovated the concept that there is "no self" (Anatta).
_	Bahá’í views on human rights are based on the concept that every person is essentially a spiritual being endowed by the Creator with talents and capacities, and that the purpose of life is to realize that potential for the benefit of society as well as the individual concerned.
_	The first location of the concept that launched CMR, "Wings", was established in a retired North Star DC-4 parked near the Mexico City International Airport.
_	It is also used to describe the concept that culture determines economic and political arrangements.
_	Being a staunch advocate for the concept that a university professor had the obligation to research and publish as well as teach, he began by having articles accepted in the journals
_	There is little or no data to support the concept that activity adjustment prevents carpal tunnel syndrome.
_	An avoidance response is a behavior based on the concept that animals will avoid performing behaviors that result in an aversive outcome.
_	Nightingale questioned the goodness of a God who would condemn souls to hell, and was a believer in universal reconciliation – the concept that even those who die without being saved will eventually make it to Heaven.
_	There were many influential people in the history of psychology that have been themselves influenced by Nancy School and the concept that it believed in.
_	His work has led to the concept that antibodies can be used as personalized anticancer drugs and to the development of an antibody-based drug, Rituxan, that is widely used to treat lymphoma.
_	Enid presents the poster in class as a social comment about racism, and Roberta is so impressed with the concept that she offers
_	It is also "a show about the inter-related nature of people's lives and the concept that they know of as time."
_	One of Seth's key ideal is ‘give us jobs- we can do the rest’ referencing the concept that giving women the ability to enter the workforce without barriers in developing countries will allow for even greater economic growth.
_	Orwell explains that he uses the expression "nationalism" for lack of a better alternative to label the concept that he describes in his essay.
_	It postulates that the flux goes from regions of high concentration to regions of low concentration, with a magnitude that is proportional to the concentration gradient (spatial derivative), or in simplistic terms the concept that a solute will move from a region of high concentration to a region of low concentration across a concentration gradient.
_	Cryonics is predicated on the concept that some people considered clinically dead by today's medicolegal standards are not actually dead according to information-theoretic death and can, in principle, be resuscitated given sufficient technological advances.
_	While they are related to it, the principle of flotation and the concept that a submerged object displaces a volume of fluid equal to its own volume are "not" Archimedes' principle.
_	Benedek was a staunch believer in the concept that the army was the chief guardian of the Habsburg monarchy and needed to protect it from liberal and nationalist forces; loyalty to the dynasty and monarch were paramount and suspicion of the civilian professional and business classes followed.
_	It set the limits of the impeachment power, fixed the concept that the judiciary was prohibited from engaging in partisan politics, defined the role of the judge in a criminal jury trial, and clarified judicial independence.
_	Stewart was a scientist at Genentech where he developed the concept that the type I interferons might be a significant component in the initiation or progression of type I diabetes.
_	The fifth disciplic line of Vedic spirituality, founded by Adi Shankaracharya, promotes the concept that the Absolute is Brahman, without clear differentiations, without will, without thought, without intelligence.
_	Schizophrenia studies provide evidence that the nature versus nurture debate in the field of psychopathology should be re-evaluated to accommodate the concept that genes and the environment work in tandem.
_	The project shows not only the restriction of physical borders, but the concept that the internet is not a borderless space.
_	Between 1600 and 1606, he had promoted the concept that a main goal of the company should be establishing colonies in the New World.
_	This is the concept that individual rights are not dependent solely on interpretation of the U.S. Constitution by the U.S. Supreme Court and other federal courts, but also can be found in state constitutions, which often provide greater protection for individuals.
_	Kaluza-Klein theory experienced a revival in the 1970s due to the emergence of superstring theory and supergravity: the concept that reality is composed of vibrating strands of energy, a postulate only mathematically viable in ten dimensions or more.
_	The technology of locating is based on measuring power levels and antenna patterns and uses the concept that a powered mobile phone always communicates wirelessly with one of the closest base stations, so knowledge of the location of the base station implies the cell phone is nearby.
_	In the series, the idea was made on the concept that MI5 officers have temptations to make money.
_	CBT-E is not specific to individual types of eating disorders but is based on the concept that common mechanisms are involved in the persistence of atypical eating disorders, AN, and BN.
_	It stops players from clustering in the same spots and reinforces the concept that "Rocket League" is a team game."
_	The Egyptian-born philosopher Plotinus (204–270 CE) brought idealism to the Roman Empire as Neoplatonism, and with it the concept that not only do all existents emanate from a "primary essence" but that the mind plays an active role in shaping or ordering the objects of perception, rather than passively receiving empirical data.
_	(this is close to the modern use of the concept that changes in the environment can mediate selective pressures on a population, so leading to evolutionary change.)
_	This sense of ownership furthers the concept that sex workers are void of agency.
_	The inspiration of scripture, the concept that God or the Holy Spirit is the author, was taken for granted by Zwingli.
_	The study was influential in advancing among American educators the concept that the child's "reading readiness" was a critically important factor in the successful teaching of reading.
_	The Pithecometra principle or Pithecometra thesis () describes the evolution of humans; the pithecometra law is analogous to the concept that "man evolved within apes" or "man descended from apes" as advocated by Thomas Henry Huxley.
_	Immune tolerance is the concept that the body is able to not mount an immune system response against certain triggers.
_	Island constraints are based on the concept that there are certain syntactical domains within a sentence that act as phrase boundaries.
_	Satellite formation flying is the concept that multiple satellites can work together in a group to accomplish the objective of one larger, usually more expensive, satellite.
_	He initiated with his two friends Arthur Ringland and Lincoln Clark the concept that became known as CARE USA.
_	However, according to jurist and Red Cross historian Pierre Boissier, no clear evidence of this origin has been found; the concept that the design was chosen to compliment the country in which the convention at which it was adopted was held, was also promoted later to counter the objections of Turkey that the flag was a Christian symbol.
_	Moorish Orthodoxy embraces an anarchist model of organization, believing strongly in the concept that "you are, each one, a priest, just for yourself" as proclaimed in the Circle 7 Koran.
_	Based on the concept that Jesus and his apostles were arguably wealthy, as well as the historical examples of his people having great wealth, and the promises for financial prosperity throughout the Old and New Testaments, Word of Faith proponents teach that modern believers also have access to the "blessing" and may also become financially wealthy.
_	He made the LP based on the concept that "places can be haunted by meaning," reasoning, "human beings are highly sensitive to the atmospheres of places, which can be enhanced or dramatically altered when you learn about the context of their history."
_	Like Lewis Adams, Dr. Washington embraced the concept that former slaves needed practical job skills to support themselves and their families.
_	In any case, the concept that an individual has a unique identity developed relatively recently in history.
_	At its core, natural predictive dialing technologies are based on the concept that call automation should work with agents, instead of call automation working before agents are connected, and then agents being connected to calls that have been determined to be 'live' people.
_	In 1750 Hopkinson suggested to Franklin the concept that electricity is attracted to points.
_	The church building has many symbolic meanings; perhaps the oldest and most prominent is the concept that the Church is the Ark (as in Noah's) in which the world is saved from the flood of temptations; therefore, most Orthodox Churches are rectangular in design.
_	The term has been reappropriated to express the rejection of the concept that government, society, or religion may judge or control one's personal liberties, and the right to control one's own sexuality.
_	She opposes the concept that there is a global orphan crisis, and believes that "the crisis is something else... a child protection crisis."
_	He has also acted in the plays he wrote namely "The Final Reharsal" (2002) which is about an actor and reality television and "The woman in me" which is loosely based on the concept that there is a woman in every man and vice versa.
_	The Austrian School is a heterodox school of economic thought that is based on methodological individualism—the concept that social phenomena result from the motivations and actions of individuals.
_	This year's festival features award-winning author Rosemary Wells and revolves around the concept that "literacy is the foundation to a child's academic success."
_	I wrote "The Dilbert Principle" around the concept that in many cases the least competent, least smart people are promoted, simply because they’re the ones you don't want doing actual work.
_	A number of modified vault particles have been produced in order to test the concept that vaults can be bio-engineered to allow their use in a wide variety of biological applications including drug delivery, biological sensors, enzyme delivery, controlled release, and environmental remediation.
_	Around the start of the 19th century mainstream science abandoned the concept that Earth was younger than millions of years.
_	Proponents of ecological economics expound the concept that the Earth's resources are finite, sustainable development is integral to future economic success, and that the real costs of market activity, including the negative impacts on health and the environment, should be reflected in true prices (full cost pricing).
_	The primary technical influence in its development was the "kenjutsu" school of Ittō-ryū (founded c. 16th century), whose core philosophy revolved around the concept that all strikes in swordsmanship revolve around the technique "kiri-oroshi" (vertical downward cut).
_	AA gained an early warrant from the Oxford Group for the concept that disease could be spiritual, but it broadened the diagnosis to include the physical as well as the spiritual and psychological.
_	The community had not yet accepted the concept that inspired the enterprise.
_	According to the Global Initiative on Psychiatry chief executive Robert van Voren, the political abuse of psychiatry in the USSR arose from the concept that people who opposed the Soviet regime were mentally ill (since there was no logical reason to oppose the sociopolitical system considered the best in the world).
_	The premise of direct group action stems from the concept that traditional methods of influencing government policy are flawed, and that more direct protests, acts of civil disobedience and (in more extreme cases) illegal acts and violence may offer the best opportunity of group success, as they captivate media attention.
_	It is based on the concept that current induced in the electrode is due to the instantaneous change of electrostatic flux lines which end on the electrode, not the amount of charge received by the electrode per second.
_	Many critics of the R2P's third pillar claim that R2P is a Western concept, but it was the African Union (AU) that pioneered the concept that the international community has a responsibility to intervene in crisis situations if a state is failing to protect its population from mass atrocity crimes.
_	He pitched an idea around the concept that Saturday is different from every other day of the week, and the representation of weekdays as buildings.
_	In the 1930s, Bergeron and W. Findeisen developed the concept that clouds contain both supercooled water and ice crystals.
_	In particular, the concept that mantle plumes are fixed relative to one another, and anchored at the core-mantle boundary, would provide a natural explanation for the time-progressive chains of older volcanoes seen extending out from some such hot spots, such as the Hawaiian–Emperor seamount chain.
_	Based on the concept that people want to listen to music at different times—a dance party at night; a pool party during the day—the mix compilation took a “big festival” and “small club” approach.
_	Dinah further enticed him with the concept that she'd help him get custody of Tammy, Cassie's daughter.
_	While many diverse consensus decision-making techniques exist, formal consensus emphasizes the concept that the particular process by which a decision is made is equally significant to gaining consensus as the content of any proposal or discussion.
_	In physics, action at a distance is the concept that an object can be moved, changed, or otherwise affected without being physically touched (as in mechanical contact) by another object.
_	The name was chosen by a panel of consumers as it represented and reinforced the concept that the salmon was from Scotland.
_	They also found that the vast majority of evidence used by conspiracy theorists to support the concept that Sandy Hook was a hoax is contradictory.
_	The final error is the concept that 'the Roman Pontiff can and should reconcile himself to and agree with progress, liberalism and modern civilization'.
_	It is the concept that events within a given paradigm are bound by causality in such a way that any state (of an object or event) is completely determined by prior states.
_	It was during this time period that Robertson introduced the concept that the Band would cease to operate as a touring act.
_	The 1993 made-for-TV feature "Jonny's Golden Quest" included in its plotline the concept that Race and Jade had been briefly married years earlier, but it also depicted Race and Hadji in place with the family at Mrs. Quest's death, in direct contradiction to explicit statements in the original series.
_	Members of the group call themselves Allah's Five Percenters, which reflects the concept that ten percent of the people in the world know the truth of existence, and those elites and agents opt to keep eighty-five percent of the world in ignorance and under their controlling thumb; the remaining five percent are those who know the truth and are determined to enlighten the rest.
_	In 1830, geologist Charles Lyell, developing ideas found in James Hutton's works, popularized the concept that the features of Earth were in perpetual change, eroding and reforming continuously, and the rate of this change was roughly constant.
_	The ACA Program embraces the concept that working adults should have access to academic credit for formal courses and examinations taken outside traditional degree programs with 100% relevance to their chosen careers.
_	It is considered a self-regulated "guild", created under the concept that lawyers are better equipped to discipline themselves without government or judicial supervision.
_	With regards to infertility in particular, counseling is necessary in order to make sure the adopters internalize the concept that the adopted child is not merely there as a substitute child until they are able to conceive.
_	However, the 2008 meeting in Zurich abandoned the simple versus complex terminology, although the participants did agree to keep the concept that most (80–90%) concussions resolve in a short period (7–10 days) and although the recovery time frame may be longer in children and adolescents.
_	And our Ukrainian rhapsodies even today, despite the musical and moral degeneration, have preserved within themselves the concept that they are the people that should elevate the ethical life of the people to a higher level, singing occasionally for their listeners religious-moral materials from the past.
_	This is often seen as undesirable because it conflicts with the concept that the strongest few are allowed to proceed to the next round.
_	He espoused the concept that a garden’s design should be based first and foremost on the needs of its occupants, taking it out of the realm of the grand garden traditions which were labour-intensive, expensive, and high maintenance.
_	For example, the concept that fewer "food miles" translates to a more sustainable meal has not been supported by major scientific studies.
_	The schools were built on the concept that fresh air, good ventilation and exposure to the outside contributed to improved health.
_	The Imperial gallon was based on the concept that an Imperial fluid ounce of water would have a mass of one Avoirdupois ounce, and indeed 1 g/cc ≈ 1.00224129 ounces per Imperial fluid ounce = 10.0224129 pounds per Imperial gallon.
_	Codexis' proprietary technology called CodeEvolver is directed evolution technology based on the concept that natural genetic mutation and selection can be accelerated in the research laboratory to obtain specific improvements in the function of single proteins and multiprotein pathways.
_	In order to test whether a concept is sensible, we sometimes " … go back to perception only tentatively and for the moment, by calling up in imagination a perception corresponding to the concept that occupies us at the moment, a perception that can never be quite adequate to the (general) concept, but is a mere "representative" of it for the time being. …
_	"We did some research into military costuming, and came up with the concept that when these ships return victorious from battle, the Klingons build some sort of epaulet onto their wings or paint a new stripe on."
_	The mathematical theory behind spontaneous symmetry breaking was initially conceived and published within particle physics by Yoichiro Nambu in 1960, the concept that such a mechanism could offer a possible solution for the "mass problem" was originally suggested in 1962 by Philip Anderson, and Abraham Klein and Benjamin Lee showed in March 1964 that Goldstone's theorem could be avoided this way in at least some non-relativistic cases and speculated it might be possible in truly relativistic cases.
_	McChrystal’s remarks generated a lot of enthusiasm within the Aspen Institute community and several leaders within the United States national service community, along with Aspen Institute CEO Walter Isaacson, approached him to see if he would be interested in helping to form a new initiative around the concept that every young person should do a year or more of national service.
_	"La Fronde" monumentally fostered the concept that women were knowledgeable and opinionated on traditionally male issues and spheres, and actively criticized fanciful representations of women in literature and the media.
_	This assumption contain the concept that people tend to shape stone tool into certain specific form for specific purpose.
_	The X-24A was flown 28 times in the program that, like the HL-10, validated the concept that a Space Shuttle vehicle could be landed unpowered.
_	An ardent supporter of the concept that defence construction was detrimental to troop morale, Simmons was eventually placed in command of a committee to ascertain the readiness of Singapore's defences as the Japanese invasion became apparent.
_	The Imamat, or belief in the divine guide is a fundamental belief in Shi'i Islam and is based on the concept that God would not leave humanity without access to divine guidance.
_	A season two episode featuring guest Steve Martin eschewed a laugh track altogether to support the concept that the show had been canceled that night in favor of auditioning new acts; the only audible laughs were those of the Muppet performers themselves.
_	The generic term "deputy" may also be used, deriving from the concept that the legislator is "deputising" for the electorate of his electoral district.
_	He began to experiment with the concept that a regular photographic image could not define a moment in life, and that only multiple images portrayed together could convey what he called “universal essences.”
_	Globalization is based on the concept that all of humanity shares one globe.
_	He did scientific engineering experiments and created the concept that if the steel beam edges were bent back at a 45-degree angle forming projecting tabs or "wings" before going into the molded form led to better stress distribution.
_	The BC Excalibur Party, as it will be shown on the ballot, bases its party ideals on the concept that "The Land, The People And The Government Are One".
_	In 1991 Members of Parliament Trevor Sudama and Raymond Pallackdarrysingh first introduced to the House of Representatives the concept that Indian Arrival Day should be made a national public holiday.
_	The whale could be identified as a "space whale" which takes the concept that life (or time) is too short for one to absorb all its mass surroundings.
_	The California High Cost Fund-A (CHCF-A) is a CPUC subsidy program established in 1987 based on the concept that basic telephone service should be affordable and ubiquitously accessible to all members of society.
_	[He] wanted to break the concept that farces can never get real, even for a minute.'
_	He observes as a side-note that system antics also playfully captures the concept that systems naturally "act up."
_	In an interview with "Aperture" magazine, Muellner explained how this gave rise to the concept that would become "In Most Tides an Island":
_	Judicial independence is the concept that the judiciary should be independent from the other branches of government.
_	The case upheld the concept that an owner of interest in land which was originally obtained from the rightful owner through fraud, still obtains an indefeasible interest in that title if they were unaware of the fraud.
_	The mate deprivation hypothesis alludes to the concept that the threshold for rape is lowered in males that lack alternative reproductive options.
_	In the field of verbal self-defense, the one element not entirely agreed upon is the concept that verbal defense tactics include the art of persuasion.
_	As Gough sees it, using the affair storyline would have created more scenes that would need to be shot in order to effectively tell that part of the episode, and using the concept that Mrs. Taylor had been on the run from the law worked easier for the crew.
_	The Buddha introduced the concept that there is no permanent self (soul), and this central concept in Buddhism is called "anattā".
_	This is the concept that explains how language relies on a hierarchical system that values the spoken word over the written word in Western culture.
_	The Dutch biologist and microscopist Jan Swammerdam (1637 - 1680) rejected the concept that one animal could arise from another or from putrification by chance because it was impious and like others found the concept of spontaneous generation irreligious, and he associated it with atheism and Godless opinion.
_	Dev stopped here during one of his udasis in 1584 and have spoke to a large gathering disputing the ritual of Sootak (the concept that a newborn baby is born impure).
_	All pediatric specialties started out with the concept that children with special needs were not receiving the adequate medical attention that they needed.
_	This picture contains many of the elements of General Relativity, including the concept that particles travel along geodesics in a curved space (spacetime in the relativistic case) and that the curvature is due to the presence of mass density (mass/energy density in the relativistic case).
_	The concept is used in some more textual forms of postmodernism, which rejects the strict anchoring of particular signifiers to particular signifieds and argues against the concept that there are any ultimate determinable meanings to words or signs.
_	Other exceptionalism claims include the concept that Nicaragua is highly resistant to drug trafficking as compared even to richer neighbors like Costa Rica and Panama.
_	C interferes with the adhesion of many cells to fibronectin, which led to the concept that it is anti-adhesive[1, 2].
_	The song describes the wonders of there and its entertainments (from the viewpoint of a country bumpkin), all reprising with the concept that the conditions (in 1906) represent the ultimate in progress, with little more expected.
_	According to Heinz Richner and Philipp Heeb (1995), the primary issue with the information centre hypothesis is the concept that a successful forager would return to the roost to help other, unsuccessful individuals.
_	A primary part of the design structure of Jamroom is the concept that profiles are the prime locations for content uploaded and imported into the site by the users.
_	Similarly, Billy Graham sees Samson's eyes being gouged out after he was handed over to the Philistines as his punishment for succumbing to his lust for Delilah; Graham also sees this as an example of the concept that one reaps what one sows.
_	According to O'Toole and Tureen, ""Christy" is an important case in that it revived the concept that states had special powers to deal with Indian tribes within their borders."
_	Some sitcom style humor was derived by the concept that the Goop-Mandos were required to recharge after missions by hanging upside-down in the large closet in Chris' room.
_	To have an aquic moisture regime, a soil must be saturated for at least a few days a year, because it’s implicit in the concept that dissolved oxygen is virtually absent.
_	The brand "Rasti" comes from the German word "rasten" which means "to affirm, to establish giving solidity, stability and firmness" which is the concept that governs the plastic blocks that are embedded to form various structures.
_	This is the first known reference to the concept that would later be known as the Cosmic Microwave Background.
_	Aristotle (, "Aristotélēs") (384 – 322 BCE), a student of Plato, promoted the concept that observation of physical phenomena could ultimately lead to the discovery of the natural laws governing them.
_	Control over one's personal information is the concept that "privacy is the claim of individuals, groups, or institutions to determine for themselves when, how, and to what extent information about them is communicated to others."
_	Color consciousness is a theory stating that equality under the law is not enough; it rejects the concept that there is a fundamental racial difference between people, but holds that physical features, particularly skin color, can and do negatively impact some people's life opportunities.
_	Many issuers attempt to mitigate the impact by inserting "collateral cut-back" provisions into their indentures, but the SEC has not endorsed the concept that such a cut-back does not constitute a release of collateral.
_	Well known for his imaginative teaching style, Du Brul pioneered the concept that, in biomechanics, function follows form.
_	Landis has proposed aerostat habitats followed by floating cities, based on the concept that breathable air (21:79 oxygen/nitrogen mixture) is a lifting gas in the dense carbon dioxide atmosphere, with over 60% of the lifting power that helium has on Earth.
_	His belief in biological factors lead to the concept that certain drugs, such as cocaine, had an antidepressant functionality.
_	A study published in 2009 was reported by "The Daily Telegraph" as supporting the concept that "man flu" does not exist, but many believe that the media were misunderstanding or misrepresenting the science.
_	Lead time bias is the concept that early diagnosis may artificially inflate the survival statistics of a cancer, without really improving the natural history of the disease.
_	Length bias is the concept that slower growing, more indolent tumors are more likely to be diagnosed by screening tests, but improvements in diagnosing more cases of indolent cancer may not translate into better patient outcomes after the implementation of screening programs.
_	Already the concept that bad people stay dead and good, loving people return to life is evident.
_	Stammler with the concept that legal philosophy should not simply relate morals and ethics to abstract legal rules, since these might not give just results in practice.
_	The study by researcher Darren Spedale found that 15 years after Denmark had granted same-sex couples the rights of marriage, rates of opposite-sex marriage in those countries had gone up, and rates of opposite-sex divorce had gone down – contradicting the concept that same-sex marriages would have a negative effect on opposite-sex marriages.
_	It was based on the concept that the Vietnam War would dwindle away into defeat for the communists.
_	The videos cover both espionage tactics and historical applications of the concept that it highlighted in the episode.
_	The panel of three Canadians and two Americans found that the DoC's determination could not be supported by substantial evidence; which was a controversial decision, because the vote was along national lines, and the majority decision was based on the concept that U.S. law required the Department of Commerce to not only establish the existence of a subsidy, but also prove that the subsidy benefited the Canadian lumber industry.
_	However it makes no attempt at consistent historical accuracy, and incorporates some obvious anachronisms (aided by the concept that Merlyn lives backwards in time rather than forwards, unlike everyone else).
_	The park focuses on positive African-American imagery to embrace the concept that "It takes a whole village to raise a child."
_	Even while he was alive, Baum was styled as "the Royal Historian of Oz" to emphasize the concept that Oz is an actual place.
_	Underlying his ideas, consolidated in "Institutional Economics" (1934) was the concept that the economy is a web of relationships between people with diverging interests.
_	As a theme for her album, Christian singer-songwriter Sara Groves focused on the concept that "God has invited us, as mere human beings, to add to the beauty of his plan and creation."
_	Uwe Reinhardt wrote that both public and private healthcare programs can ration, rebutting the concept that governments alone impose rationing:
_	The torturers sought to convey the concept that, within the siege, they were the gods who decided the fate of the detainees, mere mortals.
_	Discussing the album title, Madden said "Youth Authority" was the concept that "there’s a kid out there right now who has a guitar, or a microphone, or a laptop, with a dream that is going to beat the odds."
_	Bpeace’s methods are based on the concept that “The jobs that Fast Runners create have a multiplier effect – those jobs sustain thousands of families, boost local purchasing power, and in turn, strengthen other local businesses.
_	He portrays the concept that because of king Robert's death in 1343 that all hope is lost for a continuation of a renaissance that was initiated at the coronation sponsored by the king.
_	"At the time of the slave trade, the traditional nature-centered religions of West and Central Africa were characterized by the concept that human well-being is governed by spiritual balance, by devotion to a supreme creator and a pantheon of lesser deities, by veneration and propitiation of the ancestors, and by the use of charms to embody spiritual power.
_	The table uses limited excerpts from the copyrighted TNM system to demonstrate the concept that there are changes, as well as similarilities, between editions.
_	An example of such an idea was the concept that the entire universe is completely nullified to God.
_	A range of theories are based on the concept that minor modifications to animals' development as they grow from embryo to adult may have been able to cause very large changes in the final adult form.
_	Jean Baudrillard, in "Simulacra and Simulation", introduced the concept that reality or the principle of "The Real" is short-circuited by the interchangeability of signs in an era whose communicative and semantic acts are dominated by electronic media and digital technologies.
_	By the 1950s, Cheskin had already implemented the concept that brands, messages, and offerings could be coordinated and delivered through multiple contexts and media.
_	The event caught the party leadership off guard: the concept that Lin could betray Mao de-legitimized a vast body of Cultural Revolution political rhetoric, as Lin was already enshrined into the Party Constitution as Mao's "closest comrade-in-arms" and "successor".
_	It is not possible to make a mental leap to the conservative and patriarchal societies that prevailed for example during the Second Empire; in effect, the totalitarian character of the regime moved away from the concept that had been made of women being put on a shelf by society.
_	However, very few of these people could be counted among the hiking community of the day, to whom a trail was something to follow, and they had difficulty grasping the concept that the trail was open.
_	NeuroSolutions is based on the concept that neural networks can be broken down into a fundamental set of neural components.
_	However, just as prevalent is the concept that what the eyes see and the resulting memories are not to be trusted.
_	This reinforces the concept that abstract needs for individual and group self-esteem may continue to be selected for by evolution, even when they sometimes confer risks to physical health and well-being.
_	The "Abhidharma system" which attributes "svabhava" to "dharma" because dharmas, the foundational components of the world, are independent of causes and conditions in a specific sense, retains the concept that dependently originated entities ("pratityasamutpanna") are separate from the dependently designated entities ("prajnaptisat").
_	The Foundation also stated that the activities of Rulaizong were a kind of idolatry, violating the concept that all sattvic beings are equal in Buddhism.
_	In some cases, "leʻi" simply means “no, not at all”, expressing the concept that an event that had been expected to happen or had been thought to have happened, did not occur after all (Mosel & Hovdhaugen, 1992, pp. 479).
_	Natal astrology, also known as Genethliacal astrology, is the system of astrology based upon the concept that each individual's personality or path in life can be determined by constructing a natal chart for the exact date, time, and location of a person's birth.
_	OS/360 also pioneered the concept that the operating system keeps track of all of the system resources that are used, including program and data space allocation in main memory and file space in secondary storage, and file locking during update.
_	Proteostasis, a portmanteau of the words protein and homeostasis, is the concept that there are competing and integrated biological pathways within cells that control the biogenesis, folding, trafficking and degradation of proteins present within and outside the cell.
_	This is expressed by the concept that "all things have one and the same principle" ("wànwù yīlǐ" 萬物一理).
_	However, even while comparing her work to poststructuralist critical theory, Bowman says that Chow rethinks the concept that post-structuralist arguments need "always make things more complicated," instead trying to make these ideas more manageable.
_	Rather, it recognizes the concept that additional barriers tend to segment the markets.
_	Dependent designation is one of the 'three dependencies' asserted by the Madhaymikas, the others being dependent arising, which relates to the concept that all existents arise from causes; and dependence upon parts, the idea that all existents are composite.
_	Heinkel was so impressed by the concept that he arranged the transfer to the project of Adolph Müller from Junkers, who was developing an axial compressor-powered design, renamed as the Heinkel HeS 30.
_	This style adds to the concept that Love, though subtle and delicate, is much stronger than Death.
_	This comes from the concept that God originally designed humans in His image, and therefore as relational beings.
_	In the present, she often reflects on her happy earlier childhood (Millie Donnelly, Hunter and Sadie Fitzmaurice, Sarah Minto) with her father, her unconventional homeschooled education with him and how he changed dramatically after the death of her mother, also named Emily (Mullins) on the night of her birthday in a car accident, an event that led to his mental breakdown; he became obsessive with writing, refusing to eat and sleep and was preoccupied with the concept that humans and the surrounding universe, such as a blade of grass, shared the same molecules.
_	Marriage privatization is the concept that the state should have no authority to define the terms of personal relationships such as marriage.
_	The methodology was based on the concept that in facing the event, the charge of the triggers may be attenuated over time.
_	"To George Teissier he owes a preference for quantitative descriptions; André Lwoff initiated him into the potentials of microbiology; to Boris Ephrussi he owes the discovery of physiological genetics, and to Louis Rapkine the concept that only chemical and molecular descriptions could provide a complete interpretation of the function of living organisms."
_	First, the concept that the 1960 act "carved out" the buildings used by the government goes against the plain language of the statute.
_	This supports the concept that adaptation to high altitude arose independently among different highlanders as a result of convergent evolution.
_	Under Armstrong, AOL has established Seed, a journalism and engineering system based on the concept that editors can make decisions on what to write about by compiling data and algorithms from leading search engines and websites, and acquired the digital media property "The Huffington Post" in 2011.
_	The book synthesized emotions and neurology and introduced the concept that action is a result of impression.
_	While filtering and MD5/TTL protection is already available for most BGP implementations (thus preventing the source of most attacks), the problem stems from the concept that ISPs rarely ever filter advertisements from other ISPs, as there is no common or efficient way to determine the list of permissible prefixes each AS can originate.
_	Together with this comes the concept that the powerful 'Grandfather' only grows old over the course of the year.
_	Rameau first proposed the concept that ninth and eleventh chords are built from seventh chords by (the composer) placing a "supposed" bass one or two thirds below the fundamental bass or actual root of the chord.
_	Bell originated the concept that the word "television" is better suited for the Internet than traditional broadcast media, and was invited to speak at Google on August 17, 2012, to elaborate on his observation:
_	The name East-East is derived from the concept that Lithuania is located in the east of Europe, while Japan lies in the east of Asia.
_	She gave origin to the concept that female consort, whether she is Parvati or Kali, is the most important Shakti of all, thus becoming the role model for all the goddesses in later period (the Purana has several mentions of this concept).
_	Lean manufacturing is based on the concept that production should be driven by the actual customer demands and requirements.
_	Gratitude in Action is the concept that drives the Aurora Humanitarian Initiative.
_	In classical philosophy, however, eternity is defined as what exists outside time while sempiternity is the concept that corresponds to the colloquial definition of eternity.
_	Following a pattern very similar to the Neoplatonists, the Medieval Jewish mystical tradition of Kabbalah developed the concept that the Universe is regarded as a series of emanations from the Godhead, namely, the 10 sephirot.
_	Koch used to be a proponent of the idea of consciousness emerging out of complex nervous networks, but in 2014 he published a short discussion work, "In which I argue that consciousness is a fundamental property of complex things", where he introduced the concept that consciousness is a fundamental property of networked entities, and therefore cannot be derived from anything else, since it is a simple substance.
_	Market populism, coined by Thomas Frank, is the concept that the free market is more democratic than any democracy.
_	In his 1883 lecture "Le Judaïsme comme race et comme Religion" he disputed the concept that Jewish people constitute a unified racial entity in a "biological" sense, which made his views unpalatable within racial antisemitism.
_	This stratagem promoted the concept that all mariachi groups could be unified to those versions by taking them as examples.
_	The caste system among the Mandara people integrated the concept that the strata have innate pollution and therefore they are stigmatized, however there is no evidence that their Islamic belief integrated the differences between the socially differentiated castes in their society to have been divinely sanctioned.
_	He explored the concept that mental illness represents a crisis brought about by the failure to grow into higher social loyalties, including loyalty to God.
_	For present purposes, it is simply worth noting that the Federal Circuit appears to be inching closer again to the concept that patent law is simply a unique beast, with unique rules and requirements.
_	This idea was based on the concept that the multinational corporations had reaped profits far in excess of what was considered "normal business practice".
_	In the liner notes, Hancock further points out his approach to the album, recalling his previous efforts: "What I was into then, and have been thinking about more and more, was the concept that there is a type of music in between jazz and rock."
_	Intersectionality is the concept that Chicanas belong to more than one oppressed group – race, gender, and class.
_	The cohort model is based on the concept that auditory or visual input to the brain stimulates neurons as it enters the brain, rather than at the end of a word.
_	A plaque in front of the sculpture bears the inscription, "The artist expresses the concept that God, through the spirit of man is manifested in the family, the noblest human relationship."
_	He ridicules the concept that the fate of a man could be dependent upon the constellations; he argues that such a theory would rob life of purpose, and would make man a slave of destiny.
_	Phenotypic plasticity focuses on the concept that the same genotype can produce different phenotypes in response to different environments.
_	The experiment supported the concept that a concentration gradient in a binary alloy would result in the different components having different velocities in the solid solution.
_	The ""one thing I cannot come to terms with is the concept that homosexuality must be equated with heterosexuality and that homosexual couples must be equated with married couples"".
_	With the development of quantum mechanics in the beginning of the 20th century came the concept that mathematical operations could be performed on an entire particle wavefunction.
_	In Christology, the concept that "the Christ" is the "Logos" (i.e., "The Word") has been important in establishing the doctrine of the divinity of Christ and his position as God the Son in the Trinity as set forth in the Chalcedonian Creed.
_	Tim Cook continued to elaborate on the concept that a PC would no longer have to be the center of one's digital life, considering them to be a "device" on the same level as any portable device that a particular user owns.
_	Perhaps his greatest accomplishment was his teaching the concept that one can come closer to God through acts of loving kindness and by studying the Hebrew Bible or Torah.
_	In 2009, Ning Tang founded YND to convey the concept that "Everyone has credit.
_	The two main characters enter into a teacher-student relationship that explains the concept that the world that we inhabit is illusory, as well as the underlying reality behind it:
_	This work prompted the concept that “regulated protein aggregation”, which provides a theoretical framework for understanding the biology of neurodegenerative disease, including Alzheimer’s disease and Amyotrophic Lateral Sclerosis.
_	The slippery slope argument against assisted death takes on the concept that assisted death on incompetent patients is unavoidable.
_	Field theory is the concept that the brain acts as a single functional unit.
_	Wein wrote the second story featuring Man-Thing (written circa May 1971, published in June 1972), introducing Barbara Morse and the concept that "Whoever Knows Fear Burns at the Man-Thing's Touch", and later edited Steve Gerber's run on that title.
_	In those days, the concept that the Sun revolved around the Earth came to his mind.
_	Others have expressed a different view, accepting or tolerating such marriages, instead focusing their attention towards the concept that the children of a Jewish parent be raised Jewish, with some sense of their identity rooted in Judaism and in Jewish culture.
_	Johannine "agency christology" combines the concept that Jesus is the Son of his Father with the idea that he has come into the world as his Father's agent, commissioned and sent by the Father to represent the Father and to accomplish his Father's work.
_	In 1948 Tolkien began a new version, eliminating mentions of the Sun and the Moon and introducing the concept that Ilúvatar created the world after the visions of the Ainur died away.
_	The researchers found correlations between treatment with antipsychotic drugs and lipid metabolism, in both a lipid-class-specific and drug-specific manner, establishing new foundations around the concept that pharmacometabolomics provides powerful tools for enabling detailed mapping of drug effects.
_	The team finally settled on the concept that "MediEvil" would support both analogue and digital camera-related controls for balance reasons.
_	He gave strong support to the concept that the race should be open to public entry, not just to professional or amateur specialist runners and countered opposition based upon concern regarding the risks.
_	Reducing hostility (which is inversely correlated with physical health), and the concept that unforgiveness may reduce the immune system because it puts stress on the individual.
_	The vicissitudes of the acceptance of the concept that "genes are DNA" deserve the scholarly praise they have received.
_	Another important aspect was the concept that traditional customs, no matter what the content, were accepted as normal.
_	[is] a system based on the concept that the ultimate authority and control over a company rests with those who provide the capital (i.e. the shareholders) in general meeting.
_	Brad was also one of the first researchers to embrace the concept that birds shared their evolutionary lineage with dinosaurs.
_	Makary has also supported the concept that doctors can offer patients a copy of videos of their laparoscopic procedures.
_	Also, the concept that stove burners in California might soon emit trace amounts of blast radionuclides into family homes did not sit well with the general public.
_	The name was chosen to reflect both the group's varied musical taste, and the concept that they weren't just "another boy band".
_	This is based on the concept that riskier assets should have higher expected returns than less risky assets.
_	In contrast to the concept that the primary duty of a company is to maximize profits for the benefit of shareholders, SEP emphasizes maximizing the interests of all stakeholders and having a greater focus on long-term profitability as opposed to short-term success.
_	The beliefs of these individuals were centered on the concept that people could understand the world through consideration of nature.
_	The show-off hypothesis is the concept that more successful men have better mate options.
_	The 1835 proclamation by Governor Richard Bourke implemented the doctrine of ""terra nullius"" upon which British settlement was based, reinforcing the concept that there was no land owner before British possession and that Aboriginal people could not sell or assign the land, and individuals could only acquire it through distribution by the Crown.
_	Bicycle poverty reduction is the concept that access to bicycles and the transportation infrastructure to support them can dramatically reduce poverty.
_	The Greater Cause program is designed to record the activities and reinforce the concept that Kappa Sigma members should play an active role in their communities.
_	To the concept that priestly vocation are a gift from God he countered: "we should also ask whether the Church is a good steward of the gift."
_	Wilhelm Weinberg (Stuttgart, 25 December 1862 – 27 November 1937, Tübingen) was a German obstetrician-gynecologist, practicing in Stuttgart, who in a 1908 paper, published in German in "Jahresheft des Vereins für vaterländische Naturkunde in Württemberg" (The Annals of the Society of National Natural History in Württemberg), expressed the concept that would later come to be known as the Hardy-Weinberg principle.
_	The first attempt to end the table seating system failed, and one man commented that "the outcome was the will of God," introducing McNeill to the concept that "the status quo equals the will of God."
_	Resisting the urge to judge and embracing the concept that things are as they should be are cornerstones to Diego’s approach to life and art.
_	Future challenges for the concept that have been identified include the way issuing and earning process for the badges is quality-assured; the centralization (or not) of the badge-issuing process and the legitimacy of any organization that takes charge of it; the way badge issuers are using the open standard to ensure that the learners stay in control and badges remain interoperable; and the way badges will be used and recognized by education institutions, enterprises and individuals.
_	Haseltine was one of the very few scientists in the late 1970s who continued to work on the concept that retroviruses played an important role in human diseases.
_	In a series of what have been called thought experiments, various topics (literary greats, multiverses, time, dreams, democracy, television shows, sports) are analyzed under “Klosterman’s Razor”: the concept that "the best hypothesis is the one that reflexively accepts its potential wrongness to begin with.
_	Brainwashing (also known as mind control, menticide, coercive persuasion, thought control, thought reform, and re-education) is the concept that the human mind can be altered or controlled by certain psychological techniques.
_	In the workplace, this is depicted by the concept that increased racial heterogeneity among employees is associated with job dissatisfaction among majority members.
_	Michael Quinn Patton motivated the concept that the evaluation procedure should be directed towards:
_	It is even said that the concept that the man is explaining sometimes is something that the woman he is explaining it to already knew and that he may have even interrupted the woman who was first trying to explain it.
_	Contract sanctity is the concept that U.S. agricultural products already contracted to be exported should not be subject to government cancellation because of short supply, national security, or foreign policy reasons.
_	Not only was the concept that the judicial system was entitled to 'every man's evidence' itself deeply rooted in the Constitution, but merely determining the scope of the privilege ("when" would it apply?) and identifying "who" would receive it (only regularly employed journalists?
_	Article II espouses unlimited atonement, the concept that Christ died for all.
_	It basically outlined the concept that Canada should accommodate the United States wishes as much as possible and negotiate the best position possible for itself in the process.
_	The tropical zodiac has no connection to the stars, and as long as no claims are made that the constellations themselves are in the associated sign, astrologers avoid the concept that precession seemingly moves the constellations.
_	While some speculate about a direct correlation to high anxiety and stress or the concept that catathrenia is purely psychological, there is only anecdotal evidence of either proposed cause.
_	Teleadministration is based on the concept that documents in electronic format have legal value.
_	It is the concept that an individual, 'the hypnotist,' can control another individual's behavior via gaining rapport.
_	Kippenberger also felt that he was working in the face of a 'perceived death of painting' and his art reflects his struggle with the concept that, at the turn of the millennium, it was impossible to produce anything original or authentic.
_	Imamate, or belief, in the divine guide is a fundamental belief in the Twelver Shia doctrine and is based on the concept that God would not leave humanity without access to divine guidance.
_	It disagrees with the concept that marriage acts as a form of distraction in attaining nearness to God.
_	TDR is based on the concept that with land ownership comes the right of use of land, or land development.
_	Hawes set out to challenge this, and to dispel the concept that American design was only for leisure-wear and sportswear.
_	However, the concept that all Late Cretaceous North American troodontids belong to one species began to be questioned soon after Currie's 1987 paper was published, including by Currie himself.
_	Underlying these developments lay the concept that the Edmund J. Safra Campus (and no doubt many other university campuses) already was a museum – or almost.
_	The novel references current theories on animal psychology such as the concept that gossip is actually a way in which humans bond with one another, comparable to the social grooming chimpanzees practice in order to form bonds with individuals in their population.
_	Released on October 14, 2008, the album features 11 new tracks drawing on the concept that God’s living water equals life in all its color.
_	In 1905, Albert Einstein published his special theory of relativity, which led to the concept that space and time can be viewed as a single construct known as "spacetime".
_	Residual self-image is the concept that individuals tend to think of themselves as projecting a certain physical appearance, or certain position of social entitlement, or lack thereof.
_	Recognizing both the concept that the access to the computer is governed by the scope of the employment agreement and a concept that the employee is still considered to have an authorization to use a computer, even if he or she used a computer or information on it in a ways contrary to employer's limitations, the Firth Circuit agreed with the former interpretation elaborated on it.
_	MARIACHI is also the name of the research project created and directed by Brookhaven National Laboratory (BNL) on Long Island, New York, initially intended to verify the concept that VHF signals can be reflected off the ionization patch produced by a cosmic ray shower.
_	There are various tools associated with the concept that of countersurveillance that disrupt the effectiveness and possibilities of dataveillance.
_	In the 1970s he helped establish the audiophile record company Sheffield Lab, and set up his own label, TownHall Records, which specializes in historical reissues and comprehensive collections of jazz and classical music and is "dedicated to the concept that recordings should preserve permanently the important musical art of our time".
_	Morris Janowitz later introduced the concept that press coverage could serve as an index of the social structure and values of distinct communities.
_	Developed in 1969 by urbanist Jane Jacobs and John Jackson the concept that Detroit’s shipbuilding industry from the 1830s was the critical antecedent leading to the 1890s development of the auto industry in Detroit since the gasoline engine firms easily transitioned from building gasoline engines for ships to building them for automobiles.
_	The majority of the current data supports the concept that bone mass is controlled by LRP5 through the osteocytes.
_	Jens Esmark (31 January 1763 – 26 January 1839) was a Danish-Norwegian professor of mineralogy who contributed to many of the initial discoveries and conceptual analyses of glaciers, specifically the concept that glaciers had covered larger areas in the past.
_	"One part Mark Twain, one part WC Fields, one part musical icon - an icon who is a large part of America's first music family, one part iconoclastic and beloved professor giving back to the music that nurtured him, and most importantly, a man whose life is testament to the concept that 'Life IS Good'.
_	The second was the Lay Cooperation in Ministry, which was founded on the concept that the lay people were the ministers of a church, and under their leadership and action literally countless lives can be impacted.
_	The exile community in Babylon thus became the source of significant portions of the Hebrew Bible: Isaiah 40–55, Ezekiel, the final version of Jeremiah, the work of the Priestly source in the Pentateuch, and the final form of the history of Israel from Deuteronomy to 2 Kings Theologically, they were responsible for the doctrines of individual responsibility and universalism (the concept that one god controls the entire world), and for the increased emphasis on purity and holiness.
_	Dillon expresses the concept that leroma is a Gnostic adaptation of Hellenic ideas, since before Philo there is no Jewish tradition that accepts that the material world or cosmos was based on an ideal world that exists as well.
_	Hemry, through John Geary, continually reinforces the concept that military forces must be subordinate to civilian authority, and shows democratic systems of civilian government (the Alliance) to be superior to a commercial-military autocracy (the Syndics).
_	Jabir's theory was based on the concept that metals like gold and silver could be hidden in alloys and ores, from which they could be recovered by the appropriate chemical treatment.
_	Based on the belief in the concept that "each day is a good day", he did Navasakthi Homam and Vinayaka Pooja on the 15th day of Panguni and celebrated 10 days festival from the 16th day of Panguni at Thayamangalam.
_	He promoted the concept that the machine itself was a work of art, and his pieces were designed to demystify machinery and stimulate viewer reaction.
_	Therefore, the lessons in these two novels particularly share the concept that "The New Woman" goes against society.
_	The Imamat, or belief in the divine guide, is a fundamental belief in Shia Islam and is based on the concept that God would not leave humanity without access to divine guidance.
_	Between 1767 and 1792, James Burnett, Lord Monboddo, included in his writings not only the concept that man had descended from primates, but also that, in response to the environment, creatures had found methods of transforming their characteristics over long time intervals.
_	Tied to the detection of contrast and grouping is the concept that discovery of an object after a struggle is more pleasing than one which is instantaneously obvious.
_	The law allowed pardons for people convicted of crimes under the Nazis, based on the concept that Nazi law "went against the basic ideas of justice".
_	Some companies place materials management on a level whereby there is a logistics director, other companies see the importance level as managing at the plant level by hiring an inventory manager or materials manager, and still other companies employ the concept that the supervisors in the plant are responsible accompanied by a planners.
_	This verse has been interpreted by many Muslims as foreshadowing the concept that the figure of the Earth has an ellipsoid shape.
_	The book centers around the concept of time travel, and discusses the concept that there may be limits to science.
_	The Buddha introduced the concept that there is no soul (self) tying the cycle of rebirths, in contrast to themes asserted by various Hindu and Jaina traditions, and this central concept in Buddhism is called "anattā"; Buddha also affirmed the idea that all compounded things are subject to dissolution at death or "anicca".
_	Strong consideration was also given to the concept that air, naval, and ground forces should coordinate effectively to provide optimum support of ground troops.
_	SeaWorld Orlando revealed the concept that was to become "Manta" to a gathering of travel industry representatives and community leaders on April 2, 2008, although it had been in the planning stages for years.
_	A number of genetic, cell biology, biochemical and animal studies support the concept that Aβ plays a central role in the development of Alzheimer's disease pathology.
_	A hallmark of these programs is that they are based on the concept that children and adolescents have strengths and abilities unique to their developmental stage and that they are not merely "inadequate" or "undeveloped" adults.
_	Sartre begins by defining antisemitism as characterized by certain opinions: attributing "all or part of his own misfortunes and those of his country to the presence of Jewish elements in the community, ... proposes to remedy this state of affairs by depriving the Jews of certain of their rights, by keeping them out of certain economic and social activities, by expelling them from the country, by exterminating all of them ..." (p. 7) He then describes the concept that these antisemitic opinions are produced by external causes, such as the experience of objective situations involving Jews.(p.8-9)
_	The Sikh slogan and popular form of greeting Sati Sri Akal Sikh sums up the concept that the timeless Being is the singular Eternal Reality.
_	Initial experiments revolved around the concept that any electrical change that is brought about in neurons must occur through the action of ions.
_	Womanism becomes the concept that binds these novelists together.
_	Smith presented the concept that the CIA would need a worldwide system of support bases, which usually could be tenant organizations on military bases.
_	She highlights the concept that patriarchal capitalist cultures are parasitic upon the unilateral gift-giving of mothers and nature.
_	The men's rights movement rejects the concept that men are privileged relative to women.
_	"Substituted judgment" is the concept that a family member can give consent for treatment if the patient is unable (or unwilling) to give consent themselves.
_	The tie between his online shopping systems and the innovative information systems he created is the concept that videotex was a new, mass communications medium.
_	Referred to as the 21 grams experiment as one subject lost "three-fourths of an ounce" (21.3 grams), the experiment is regarded by the scientific community as flawed and unreliable, though it has been credited with popularizing the concept that the soul weighs 21 grams.
_	This is the concept that limits loss or potential losses by exposing the perpetrator to the probability of detection and apprehension prior to the consummation of the crime through the application of perimeter lighting, barred windows and intrusion detection systems.
_	Ibn al-Haytham, an Arab Muslim, was an early proponent of the concept that a hypothesis must be proved by experiments based on confirmable procedures or mathematical evidence—hence understanding the scientific method 200 years before Renaissance scientists.
_	Such a right is based on the concept that "to be a parent" is a commitment that an adult takes with respect to his/her children, not to the other parent, so that it "cannot and must not" be influenced by any kind of separation among parents.
_	His account of this case also shows that he appreciated the concept that paralysis on one side of the body indicated compression on the opposite side of the brain.
_	This was at odds with the theories held by cultural evolutionary archaeologists, who whilst accepting diffusion and migration as reasons for cultural change, also accepted the concept that independent cultural development could occur within a society, which was something culture-historical archaeologists typically refused to accept.
_	Merlyn instills in Arthur the concept that the only justifiable reason for war is to prevent another from going to war and that contemporary human governments and powerful people exemplify the worst aspects of the rule of Might.
_	These were carbureted engines and the relative "imprecise" nature of such limited the MPG abilities of the concept that now under MPI (Multi-Port fuel Injection) allows for higher MPG too.
_	However, the drug, while supporting the concept that DP2 contributes to asthmatic disease, did not show sufficient advantage over existing drugs and was discontinued from further development for this application (see setipiprant).
_	In post-revolutionary Mexico, she helped popularize the concept that a child’s mental illness could possible stem from conditions of their exposed environment or economic circumstance, and not just their biological genetics.
_	Cells in many ways can be seen as their own form of naturally occurring wetware, similar to the concept that the human brain is the preexisting model system for complex wetware.
_	The term has been criticized by Green himself, as he disagrees with the concept that he is singlehandedly responsible for launching any one individual's career, or propelling an individual to success.
_	He is perhaps best known for his concept of the looking glass self, which is the concept that a person's self grows out of society's interpersonal interactions and the perceptions of others.
_	While Zoroaster's Ormuzd created the universe with his thought, materialist Zurvanism challenged the concept that anything could be made out of nothing.
_	Geoffrey Landis of NASA's Glenn Research Center in particular has pointed out that "[at] cloud-top level, Venus is the paradise planet", as one could construct aerostat habitats and floating cities there easily, based on the concept that breathable air is a lifting gas in the dense Venusian atmosphere.
_	Once again, however, the concept that public housing was only for the low-income populations had taken hold, and also the concept that only through private initiative and financing, with substantial government support, could the United States provide appropriate middle-income housing.
_	This supports the concept that in higher temperatures, the membrane is more fluid than in colder temperatures.
_	Kalmus firmly believed in the concept that the Rutherford Appleton Laboratory, as the National Laboratory for Particle Physics, had as an important part of its mission the support of UK university groups.
_	Symbolic interactionism, the concept that people act toward things based on the meaning they have for them; and these meanings are derived from social interaction and modified though interpretation), plays a key in role in the consumer adoption of technological innovations.
_	The contemporary concept of "wealth creation" is substantially different from the concept that was entertained in the mid-20th century, also because who exactly and legally "owns" the wealth, often becomes a secondary issue in business.
_	Respect for persons is the concept that all people deserve the right to fully exercise their autonomy.
_	Partial construction is the concept that the constructor creates a partially constructed (rather than fully formed) offspring, which is then left to complete its own construction.
_	The meaning of the phrase originates from the concept that out of the union of the original Thirteen Colonies emerged a new single nation.
_	Taxpayer standing is the concept that any person who pays taxes should have standing to file a lawsuit against the taxing body if that body allocates funds in a way that the taxpayer feels is improper.
_	Social theorists have been investigating the concept that females have protective factors against autism by having a more developed language repertoire and more empathy skills.
_	He supported the concept that African-American and Native American music should be used as a foundation for the growth of American music.
_	They hold that the doctrine of hell as defined by mainstream Christianity is incompatible with the concept that God is love.
_	In physics, the relativity of simultaneity is the concept that "distant simultaneity" – whether two spatially separated events occur at the same time – is not absolute, but depends on the observer's reference frame.
_	In the article they state that CASA is the concept that people mindlessly apply social rules and expectations to computers even though they know that these machines do not have feelings, intentions or human motivations.
_	The problem was solved with the concept that the handling would be actively discouraged by a comic antagonistic retailer in the commercials.
_	Wolcott came up with the concept that exposure time could be reduced by an improvement on the mechanical arrangement of the image focusing process.
_	Among the central points of his scholarly work have been such subjects as Israelite aniconic cult, put in the context of a wider study of Ancient Near Eastern religion (the monograph "No Graven Image?", in which he argued that the official Jerusalem cult was indeed aniconic in nature), Israelite images of divinity as reflected in various divine names ("In Search of God", subsequently translated into many languages), the state officialdom of the Solomonic era (his doctoral dissertation, "Solomonic State Officials"), and the question of "Dying and rising gods" in the Ancient Near East (in the book ""The Riddle of Resurrection"", in which he defended the concept that there were, indeed, prevalent images of divine beings believed to die and return to life again).
_	Wu Youke (1582–1652) developed the concept that some diseases were caused by transmissible agents, which he called liqi (pestilential factors).
_	the general response was very, very positive, but very, very much rooted in the concept that this is an emotional album.
_	All four center around the concept that knowledge plus life skills minus psychosocial barriers lead to changes in behaviors to form agents of change, reduce risk factors in context, improve gender equality, and increase opportunities for development.
_	"At the heart of our reality TV is the concept that our audience loves: the love story or the dramatic arc or conflict that is at the heart of telenovela," said Ramon Escobar, executive vice president of programming and production at Telemundo.
_	Mehmed's claim rested with the concept that Constantinople was the seat of the Roman Empire, after the transfer of its capital to Constantinople in 330 AD and the fall of the Western Roman Empire.
_	In some languages, terms with a christening theme or etymology are preferred (e.g. in Belgian French, in Belgian Dutch) or variations on a theme of naïveté and the rite of passage such as a derivation from a term for freshman, for example in French French, (de-green[horn]ing) in Netherlandic Dutch and Afrikaans (South Africa and Namibia), in Spanish, from , meaning newcomer or rookie or a combination of both, such as in the Finnish (literally "moped baptism", "moped" being the nickname for newcomers, stemming from the concept that they would be forced to drive a child's bicycle or tricycle).
_	Lemma retrieval is aided by the activation level of the concept that has yet to be verbalized.
_	In North America, Friday nights are often considered to be the "death slot", due to the concept that many shows scheduled on or moved to Friday nights would not last long before cancellation due to low ratings.
_	The second source of opposition is the concept that while Indians are not one nation, neither are the Muslims or Hindus of the subcontinent, and it is instead the relatively homogeneous provincial units of the subcontinent which are true nations and deserving of sovereignty; this view has been presented by the Baloch, Sindhi, and Pashtun sub-nationalities of Pakistan and the Assamese and Punjabi sub-nationalities of India.
_	Neither do they accept the concept that teachings of church leaders are authoritative, divinely sanctioned, and binding on those in fellowship, as is the belief of the Raven/Taylor/Hales Brethren.
_	This method is based on the concept that when occupants choose their clothing according to their environment, the outdoor environment is more influential than the indoor one.
_	This book introduced the concept that knowledge grows through childhood in a series of distinct stages that involve interaction between innate abilities and environmental feedback.
_	One theme found in a few of the songs ("Wake Up", "Terrified", and in particular "Pale Blue Dot (Interlude)") is the concept that human existence is insignificant in comparison to the universe as a whole, and that wars, fighting and killing seem pointless.
_	There is some evidence that a smaller aorta with higher peak flow velocities are associated with Still’s murmur, which certainly fits in well with the concept that the murmur is a musical phenomenon.
_	The treatise developed the concept that as fully forgiven children of God, Christians are no longer compelled to keep God's law; however, they freely and willingly serve God and their neighbors.
_	Degradomics emerged with the concept that proteolysis represents a specific mechanism for achieving cellular control over vital processes beyond control afforded by gene expression and translation and continues to produce the research necessary to understand the complex regulation of biology.
_	The Crittenden Report, by contrast, concluded that there was "no sound basis for the belief that homosexuals posed a security risk" and criticized the Hoey Report: "No intelligence agency, as far as can be learned, adduced any factual data before that committee with which to support these opinions" and said that "the concept that homosexuals necessarily pose a security risk is unsupported by adequate factual data."
_	In Buddhism, "Anatta" (Pali, Sanskrit cognate An-atman) is the concept that in human beings and living creatures, there is no "eternal, essential and absolute something called a soul, self or atman".
_	"The second, and perhaps more fundamental, idea Roger inculcated was the concept that all movement in the body is motivated in or from the torso.
_	The Nazis were dedicated to the concept that German Culture was the greatest in history, but, as with all parts of art, Hitler took an interest in suppressing the work of all those he considered "unfit" while promoting certain composers as proper Germans.
_	The aforementioned example is a reference to the concept that Danger invites Rescue.
_	An eschatological world view of history and destiny, beginning with the creation of the world and the concept that God works through history, and ending with a resurrection of the dead and final judgment and world to come.
_	However, umpires generally reject the concept that baseball provides for a tie in this way, and instead rule on the basis that either the player or the ball has reached the base first.
_	A number of archaeologists have presented the concept that a great deal of the interactions that occurred with foreign peoples at DGB-1 seem to have happened around the same time that European and Arabic writers noted the rise of Wandala, otherwise known as the Mandara Kingdom.
_	Agner Krarup Erlang first theorized a compromise which is based upon the concept that not all telephones lines are connected at the same time.
_	Thus the concept that the reasonable suspicion test reflects the public's perspective is overstated.
_	His philosophy featured the concept that "within everyone is an unlimited reservoir of energy, intelligence, and happiness".
_	Lone Star Treble-O-Lectric trains essentially introduced the concept that would later become British "N" gauge - 10 years ahead of the competition.
_	It is the concept that makes Roomer unique, and its automatic validation system makes the deal possible in every single reservation to benefit both sellers and buyers.
_	The term "Freewills" appeared in the Valiant run, introducing the concept that the rogue robots seen previously were not simply the product of random malfunctions, but were the result of a common phenomenon which allowed robots to become sentient.
_	Field experiments have shown that the half-life of POEA in shallow waters is about 13 hours, "further supporting the concept that any potential direct effects of formulated products on organisms in natural waters are likely to occur very shortly post-treatment rather than as a result of chronic or delayed toxicity."
_	The design was based on the concept that the high melting point of platinum would allow it to operate at high temperatures and that the evacuated chamber would contain fewer gas molecules to react with the platinum, improving its longevity.
_	His views on Catholic morality and voting have included the concept that voting for a pro-choice/Feminist/pro-LGBTQ candidate is morally unacceptable.
_	The major advances made at The Bronowski Institute have emerged from the concept that Parkinson's disease is a disease of the retina.
_	She became enthralled with the concept that a book could be both sculptural and mechanical.
_	Indigo Children is a 2012 American drama film about the romance between two teenagers based on the concept that some children possess special faculties.
_	They do not seek power through the suffering of others, nor do they accept the concept that personal benefits can only be derived by denial to another and They believe Witches must work within Nature for that which is contributory to health and well-being.
_	Johnsen proposed a more quantitative analysis of testis cellular architecture based on the concept that testis damage causes a successive disappearance of the most mature germ cell type.
_	Although the term "PAMP" is relatively new, the concept that molecules derived from microbes must be detected by receptors from multicellular organisms has been held for many decades, and references to an "endotoxin receptor" are found in much of the older literature.
_	The show began with the concept that Wilhelmina would have a different assistant in each episode, thus Urie was originally billed as a guest star in the credits, However, Williams loved their chemistry, and Urie was signed on as a full-time regular midway through the first season.
_	Kuzmarov in "The Myth of the Addicted Army: Vietnam and the Modern War on Drugs" challenges the popular and Hollywood narrative that US soldiers were heavy drug users, and in particular destroys the concept that the My Lai massacre was caused by drug use.
_	Bitzer's main argument is the concept that rhetoric is used to "effect valuable changes in real" (Bitzer 14).
_	Central to the work is the role of what Kant refers to as the categorical imperative, the concept that one must act only according to that precept which he or she would will to become a universal law.
_	While studying there she met Billy Adler and John Margolies, who became her collaborators and professors and introduced her to the concept that one’s personal narrative could be strong material for art.
_	If it is assumed that the structuring of an essence into "determining" and "determinable" metaphysical parts (which corresponding to a differentia and a genus respectively) exists in reality independently of its being conceived, one can apply the notion "differentia" also to the determining metaphysical part itself, and not just to the concept that expresses it.
_	The doctrine of the "living Constitution" relies on the concept that the original framers either could not come to a consensus about how to interpret, or they never intended any fixed method of interpretation.
_	According to Diamond, "Largely through the impact of Rushdoony's and North's writings, the concept that Christians are Biblically mandated to 'occupy' all secular institutions has become the "central unifying ideology" for the Christian Right" in the United States.
_	One of the first scholars to offer theological foundations on the subject of the Immaculate Conception was the Franciscan Duns Scotus who developed the concept that Mary was preserved from sin by the redemptive virtue of Jesus.
_	With this story, Pasko added the concept that the spirit of Nabu resided in Doctor Fate's helmet and took control of Fate's alter-ego Kent Nelson whenever the helmet was donned.
_	Joe then reveals that Spencer's wife never left, and alludes to the concept that she is actually part of Spencer's bionic arm.
_	The structured editing facilities of STET are based on the concept that each file is represented as a collection of named blocks of lines.
_	Proponents of LGT believe the book downplayed the concept that a last generation could, by the power of the gospel, be made holy, and stop sinning.
_	Society’s interest is in upholding the concept that all human life is sacred and should be preserved if at all possible.
_	These views are bolstered by the concept that those who enjoy a privileged position in society should have a greater obligation to pay for its costs.
_	Purple is to Lavender explores the concept that womanism is to feminism as purple is to lavender, that feminism falls under the umbrella of womanism.
_	Many adhere to the concept that a lab notebook should be thought of as a diary of activities that are described in sufficient detail to allow another scientist to replicate the steps.
_	Barry came up with the concept that became the U.S. Horse Artillery Brigade in the Army of the Potomac.
_	In 1703 Gottfried Wilhelm von Leibniz explained and envisioned the concept that would be known as "digitalization" in his publication "Explication de l'Arithmétique Binaire".
_	It's the concept that runs through the record."
_	Meyrowitz points out that the sociologists Charles Horton Cooley and George Herbert Mead furthered the concept that one's concept of the self is not defined solely by our corporeal properties, but that it is a "reflected concept."
_	Bertrand Russell satirized the concept that man is rational, saying "Man is a rational animal — so at least I have been told.
_	In Legorreta's own words: "I wanted to break the concept that libraries are imposing."
_	V.Grachev is author and active promoter of the concept that large-scale introduction of nuclear power will solve global environmental problems.
_	The Andalusian scholar Abu Bakr ibn al-Arabi (1076–1148)) elaborated the concept that Muhammad existed before creation.
_	"A Contract with the Earth" is, broadly, a manifesto that challenges those on the right to provide a strategy for repairing the planet and calls on government to embrace the concept that a healthy environment is required for a healthy democracy and economy.
_	According to Marcel Duchamp, what interests you is the concept that wants to put fifty Campbell's Soup cans on a canvas."
_	He argues that the concept that Jesus existed before his birth, was a divine being, and became human is only claimed in the Gospel of John.
_	It is the concept that, as Papillon Noir says in the finale, they will always overcome the difficulties ahead of us as long as they have courage.
_	Heath v. Alabama, 474 U.S. 82 (1985), is a case in which the United States Supreme Court ruled that, because of the doctrine of "dual sovereignty" (the concept that the United States and each state possess sovereignty – a consequence of federalism), the double jeopardy clause of the Fifth Amendment to the Constitution does not prohibit one state from prosecuting and punishing somebody for an act of which he had already been convicted of and sentenced for in another state.
_	At the time x-rays were an important means of investigating atomic structures, but the concept that light had both wave and particle properties, as demonstrated by Arthur Compton, was not universally accepted.
_	Thus, the Attributive data model capitalizes on the concept that a database is a collection of attributions, whereby information is represented in terms of its characteristics and relationships to other information.
_	He was considered an advocate of the concept that government incomes policy should prevent inflationary wage and price settlements in connection to the customary fiscal and monetary means of regulating the economy.
_	Consistent with the concept that Siglec-8 is a late differentiation marker, Siglec-8 has not been detected on the surface of relatively undifferentiated eosinophilic cell lines, such as EoL-1, AML14, AML14.3D10, or K562, the basophilic leukemia cell line KU812, nor on cells such as HL60 or EoL-3 that have been differentiated towards an eosinophil-like lineage.
_	They are unfamiliar with the concept that the camp schedule is in the 24-hour clock (Franklin asks if "oh-five-hundred" is noon, and Sally thinks "eighteen-hundred" is a year).
_	As the first president of the RLDS Church who was not a direct descendant of Joseph Smith, McMurray sought to formalize changes in thinking about prophetic leadership, the historical basis of the Book of Mormon, and the concept that priesthood authority had been restored in the 1830s after centuries of apostasy.
_	Despite recommendations from the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission to the contrary, the United States Court of Appeals for the Sixth Circuit has decided that fat people will only qualify as disabled if it can be proved that their weight is caused by an underlying condition, supporting the concept that being obese is not inherently a disability.
_	Japanese society had the concept that boys would take jobs in large, stable companies, and that girls would become educated, but would primarily become housewives.
_	Arts'd’Australie's case relied on the concept that an unwritten agency agreement existed between the parties.
_	I reject only the concept that black liberation can be achieved through the leadership of white liberals."
_	For example, his work "Adam", 1951–2, has been likened to the Jewish creation story, and the zips in that work have been interpreted as references to the concept that God and man exist as a single beam of light.
_	In the 2000s, wikis spread the concept that the web could be editable.
_	Another contributing factor to the idea of Satanism is the concept that there is an agent of misfortune and evil who operates on a cosmic scale, something usually associated with a strong form of ethical dualism that divides the world clearly into forces of good and forces of evil.
_	Self-sovereign identity (SSI) is the concept that people can store information about their digital identity in a location of their choice.
_	The postwar growth of jewelry in the United States was supported by the concept that jewelry-making techniques, believed to strengthen hand and arm muscles and foster eye-hand coordination, played a role in physical therapy programs for veterans of World War II.
_	In music theory and especially in the branch of study called the aesthetics of music, formalism is the concept that a composition's "meaning" is entirely determined by its form.
_	In 2007 Dallin H. Oaks, a senior member of the Quorum of the Twelve Apostles, and a former judge on the Utah Supreme Court, has counseled church members that "the weakening of the concept that marriages are permanent and precious has far-reaching consequences."
_	Nevertheless, although the concept that we can come to know God through "sophia" has played a role in Christian thought, no major Christian denominations profess Sophia as an independent aspect of God.
_	Also, the concept that more fireproofing is better, was defeated by industry tests of Thermo-lag 330-1 (which is not a fibrous insulation).
_	This is the concept that is present throughout the play.
_	However, opposing schools of thought revolved around the concept that those with disabilities showed a higher form of piety than those who did not have physical impairments.
_	It states the concept that there was an original language called "Pan" or the "Panic Language", meaning "Earth Language," which originated from the ability of humans to mimic sounds.
_	Matthews is also noted for his promotion of the concept that the currently-available text of the Joseph Smith Translation of the Bible is reliable and authentic.
_	She also feels sorry for his new girlfriend, because she has the concept that a cheater will always be a cheater, and while she is getting the prizes of her future, all the lover gets is the cheater boyfriend.
_	Central to the theory is the concept that national security achieved at the expense of the environment undermines the purpose for which a common defense is maintained.
_	According to aerospace publication Flight International, the MRMF programme had been motivated by the concept that a future fighter could be both lighter and cheaper if it could be so superior at mid-range combat that it could completely eliminate the need to perform any close-range dogfighting-style combat.
_	The term probably originated from the concept that enough water is "squeezed" out of the slurry to render it unflowable, so the portion that has actually entered the zone will stay in place when the squeeze pressure is removed.
_	In addition, the concept that there may be brain stem cells that could proliferate, migrate, and then differentiate into new neurons had not yet been introduced.
_	The heterosexual matrix includes the concept that society must follow an invisible norm of a hetero way of living.
_	While attending Singularity University, she along with Sam Zaid and Elliot Kroo developed the concept that lead to the launch of Getaround and Grand Prize Win at TechCrunch Disrupt in May 2011.
_	Other theories attributed to Eker include the concept that people unwilling to make major sacrifices in order to succeed "play the role" of the victim and deny that they have control of their own situations.
_	She further argues that the concept that 'genuine authorship consists in individual acts of origination' is an entirely modern myth.
_	The church building has many symbolic meanings; perhaps the oldest and most prominent is the concept that the Church is the Ark of Salvation (as in Noah's Ark) in which the world is saved from the flood of temptations.
_	BJJ promotes the concept that a smaller, weaker person can successfully defend themselves or another against a bigger, stronger, heavier assailant by using proper technique, leverage, and most notably, taking the fight to the ground, and then applying joint locks and chokeholds to defeat the opponent.
_	The New Deal expanded this idea with the concept that consumers were also in need of protection from neglect or greed by local government.
_	The album's name comes from the concept that all of humanity lives under one sky and that, therefore, man cannot operate as a solitary creature.
_	The Tunisian allegation is that this practice is based on the concept that "the Law of Necessity allows forbidden things in exceptional circumstances."
_	Hubbard expanded upon the basics of Dianetics to construct a spiritually oriented (though at this stage not religious) doctrine based on the concept that the true self of a person was a thetan — an immortal, omniscient and potentially omnipotent entity.
_	Building on his father's work, Sadi postulated the concept that "some caloric is always lost" in the conversion into work, even in his idealized reversible heat engine, which excluded frictional losses and other losses due to the imperfections of any real machine.
_	They claimed the land under the concept that it had been part of their historic territory in the area, and that New York had made an illegal treaty in 1797 when purchasing land from their leader Joseph Brant.
_	Although a similar premise had not worked in the unsuccessful NBC comedy-drama "It's a Man's World" in 1962-1963, ABC believed enough in the concept that it picked up the show as a weekly one-hour situation comedy for its fall 1977 schedule.
_	Movement in learning is a teaching method based on the concept that humans learn better through movement.
_	Justice Miller's ringing endorsement of the rights of individuals is seen as endorsing the concept that, in the United States, the people are the sovereign—not the government.
_	Later, "Grand Theft Auto IV"s stories inspired the concept that story trajectories would meet throughout the game.
_	While Zoroaster's Ormuzd created the universe with his thought, materialist Zurvanism challenged the concept that anything could be made out of nothing.
_	It is a long term investment strategy, based on the concept that in the long run equity markets give a good rate of return despite periods of volatility or decline.
_	The converse of this was seldom true; the concept that "it's a woman's prerogative to change her mind" had at least some basis in law (though a woman might pay a high social price for exercising this privilege, as explained below)—and unless an actual dowry of money or property had changed hands or the woman could be shown to have become engaged to a man only to be able to use large amounts of his money, a man was only rarely able to recover in a "breach of promise" suit against a woman, were he even allowed to file one.
_	Prior to organized ice hockey expanding to any serious extent outside Canada, the concept that the Stanley Cup champion ought to be recognized as the "world champion" was already firmly established - Stanley Cup winners were claiming the title of "world champions" by no later than the turn of the century.
_	In a similar criticism, Miller and Chris Tilley believed that by putting forward the concept that human societies were irresistibly shaped by external influences and pressures, archaeologists were tacitly accepting social injustice.
_	The premise of grey water reuse is the concept that the average household uses most of its water indoors (roughly 60%), meaning much of that water can be reused to provide for the water required to support irrigation.
_	He establishes the concept that pity is an emotion that must be elicited when, through his actions, the character receives undeserved misfortune, while the emotion of fear must be felt by the audience when they contemplate that such misfortune could possibly befall themselves in similar situations.
_	The simple production was intended to mirror the lyrics of the song, which reflect on the concept that it is impossible to speak of an infinite God with the limited vocabulary of humanity.
_	Based on the belief in the concept that "each day is a good day", he did Navasakthi Homam and Vinayaka Pooja on the 15th day of Panguni and celebrated 10 days festival from the 16th day of Panguni at Thayamangalam.
_	Agnes is also against the concept that rape is worse than death or that a women who is rape is a "zinda laash" (walking dead) pointing out that not only does this concept demean women but if rape is equated with murder, "more women will be killed after they are raped.
_	Borysewicz's lack of English helped him miss much of the criticism as he introduced the concept that the team, not the individual, is what counts in racing.
_	They outlined and executed a business plan founded on the concept that the most discriminating bagel consumer would understand and would be able to identify the distinction between a traditional bagel and the automated variety.
_	He is credited with first formulating the concept that claims of very old age are typically exaggerated.
_	In a study conducted by the AIA in a 2005 report called, " Demographic Diversity Audit", it concluded that "the concept that diversity is of critical concern to the future of the architecture profession" and warned that "the consequence of not [diversifying] is that the profession will occupy a diminished niche within the larger built environment and come to be seen to be providing services only to corporate and wealth individuals, rather than the much wider range of people who are affected by good architecture".
_	In a theoretical article, he put forth the concept that a client who valued religion tended to see the world through religious values.
_	Afterlife (also referred to as life after death) is the concept that an essential part of an individual's identity or the stream of consciousness continues to manifest after the death of the physical body.
_	Bone loss, technically spaceflight osteopenia is well documented, but the concept that radiation in an interplantary environment might affect the human brain and cause depression and/or obsessive compulsive behavior is largely conjecture, but there has been some work done studying cognitive decay of brain cancer patients receiving radiation treatment.
_	An outside bar's interpretation is based on the concept that market participants were undecided or inactive on the prior bar but subsequently during the course of the outside bar demonstrated new commitment, driving the price up or down as seen.
_	Additionally, many superhero fans disliked and disbelieved the concept that 'normal' human beings could ever hope to defeat superheroes.
_	Speaking further to Classic Rock magazine, Petit elaborated: "I embrace the concept that the blues has to change.
_	However, the release of "Ego" was scrapped and replaced with "Diva", which was taken from a different disc of "I Am... Sasha Fierce" to "Halo"; the intention was to demonstrate the concept that Beyoncé has conflicting personalities.
_	He was instrumental in moving astronomy away from the idea that Cepheids were spectroscopic binaries, and toward the concept that they were pulsators.
_	Hanus Papousek (1977), looked at the concept that learning at an early stage of development may not be beneficial to the infant if it creates overstimulation.
_	Kasarskis has called for improvements to informed consent protocols in patient research based on the concept that studies involving DNA cannot fully be made anonymous.
_	In going the wrong way, Smithy nonetheless achieved positive results and invited comparisons that eventually led to the realization that commissurotomy was the operation of choice... his work, well publicized at the time, encouraged patients and physicians and prompted the concept that operative treatment of valvular heart disease could be successful."
_	At the core of visual networking is the concept that people can participate in communities of content and communities of interest.
_	"Loss lead" describes the concept that an item is offered for sale at a reduced price and is intended to "lead" to the subsequent sale of other services or items, the sales of which will be made in greater numbers, or greater profits, or both.
_	Lord Mansfield's ruling contributed to the concept that slavery was contrary "both to natural law and the principles of the English Constitution", a position adopted by abolitionists.
_	Bradley Stern from MuuMuse stated that the clip was "absolutely gorgeous" despite its simplistic concept; he enjoyed the appearance of a Newton's cradle in the beginning of the video, and felt that it represented the lyrics "you can't have peace without a war" by exemplifying that the concept that "for every action, there is an equal and opposite reaction".
_	Antimicrobial stewardship is the concept that healthcare providers should treat an infection with an antimicrobial that specifically works well for the target pathogen for the shortest amount of time and to only treat when there is a known or highly suspected pathogen that will respond to the medication.
_	With the rise of Erich Honecker in May 1971 and the increasing international recognition of the GDR, the regime attempted to abandon the concept that the GDR was the sole legitimate government of the entire German nation.
_	The title is a literary reference to the concept that D'Angelo discusses in the prison book club in "All Prologue".
_	It looks at the ways in which ideologies of time, such as the idea that professions are greedy institutions, as well as gender ideologies, like the concept that women should take care of the family, restrict social change.
_	His statistical evidence and the closely related idea of eugenics have long since been abandoned by the scientific community, but the concept that physical traits may affect the likelihood of criminal or unethical behavior in a person still has some scientific support.
_	Mosaic mentoring is based on the concept that almost everyone can perform one or another function well for someone else — and also can learn along one of these lines from someone else.
_	The 1929 novel, "Magnificent Obsession", by Lloyd C. Douglas, also espoused this philosophy, in combination with the concept that good deeds should be performed in confidence.
_	Test was found to load more highly on a "General Intelligence" factor than on an "Achievement" factor, which is consistent with the concept that the CFIT is a measure of "fluid" rather than "crystallized" intelligence.
_	In the early 1990s, Robb began to pioneer the concept that white people were being targeted for genocide, a theme that has gained popularity in recent years among white extremists.
_	Further work by Alexander Maximow and Leroy Stevens introduced the concept that stem cells are pluripotent.
_	This is the concept that in a society where a technology had been introduced, that society must organize itself or adapt to the technology (Feenberg 211).
_	His offense: violating a state law by introducing to his students the concept that man descended from the lower life forms, a theory of the naturalist Charles Darwin.
_	Set in modern Los Angeles, the story of a variety of relationships told through the concept that nothing good ever happens after midnight.
_	After meeting with a faction of anthrocosmologists, he learns that they believe in the concept that the universe is created by one person's Theory of Everything.
_	In 1970, Codd introduced the concept that users of a database should be ignorant of the "inner workings" of the database.
_	Step two is reviewing the concept that the students already know to ensure they have the proper knowledge to assess the similarities between the two concepts.
_	Sympathetic medicine was based on the concept that things in nature that bear a resemblance to an ailment could be used to treat that ailment.
_	Meissner was an honored exploration geologist, college professor at the Colorado School of Mines and consultant, and a pioneer of the concept that methane gas could be extracted from coal beds (see coal bed methane extraction).
_	Between 1767 and 1792 James Burnett, Lord Monboddo included in his writings not only the concept that man had descended from other primates, but also that, in response to their environment, creatures had found methods of transforming their characteristics over long time intervals.
_	Lane also taught something he called the "Pyramid Prophecy", which included the concept that a Bible code was inserted by "Aryan adepts" within the King James Version of the Christian Bible.
_	Members of the group call themselves Allah's Five Percenters, which reflects the concept that ten percent of the people in the world know the truth of existence, and those elites and agents opt to keep eighty-five percent of the world in ignorance and under their controlling thumb; the remaining five percent are those who know the truth and are determined to enlighten the rest.
_	While the term "translatio studii" literally means in English the translation of studies, there is an implication within the concept that the transmission of learning also carried with it cultural ideals and information.
_	Over a century later, evolutionary biologists still use tree diagrams to depict evolution because such diagrams effectively convey the concept that speciation occurs through the adaptive and semirandom splitting of lineages.
_	This expressed the concept that each person had a direct relationship with God, rather than one mediated through a church hierarchy.
_	The company's original name stems from the concept that "making a wiki is as easy as making a peanut butter sandwich".
_	Recidivism is the concept that people that have committed crimes are likely to recommit offences, thus becoming individuals of interest in predictive policing data (see Predictive policing).
_	Occupational psychosis is the concept that one's occupation or career makes that person so biased that they could be described as psychotic.
_	Although Epicureanism is a form of hedonism insofar as it declares pleasure to be its sole intrinsic goal, the concept that the absence of pain and fear constitutes the greatest pleasure, and its advocacy of a simple life, make it very different from "hedonism" as colloquially understood.
_	Archaeologists such as Sherwood Gagliano and Edwin Jackson support the concept that Poverty Point was a site where various groups came to meet and trade on an occasional basis.
_	He has written several articles on video games, often advocating the concept that games are an art form.
_	Based on the concept that renting commercial property should be as easy as booking a hotel room, Appear Here’s mission is to make retail space accessible to everyone.
_	The phrase derives its name from the concept that certain answers are likely to be an appropriate answer to a question asked in a Sunday school even if one has not heard the question.
_	In addressing the linguistic problem of naming, Edna Andrews says that using "inclusive" and "neutral" language is based upon the concept that "language represents thought, and may even control thought."
_	While the scale has been defined as a grading system for "abnormal" genitalia, the concept that atypical genitals are necessarily abnormal is contested.
_	"Patch dynamics" refers to the concept that landscapes are dynamic.
_	Clark's work on masterpieces emphatically supports the concept that there is such a thing as a masterpiece and that in some sense it may be objectively defined or comprehended.
_	Ujamaa ('familyhood' in Swahili) was the concept that formed the basis of Julius Nyerere's social and economic development policies in Tanzania after it gained independence from Britain in 1961.
_	The title is expressive of the concept that there is a spiritual realm or dimension that exists parallel to this one.
_	In the years that followed the research of the late 1920s, more objections to biological control were raised by environmentalists, including the concept that it is risky to introduce any new species to an already compromised ecosystem, even to destroy a previously introduced one.
_	When applied to users, the terms "least user access" or "least-privileged user account" (LUA) are also used, referring to the concept that all user accounts at all times should run with as few privileges as possible, and also launch applications with as few privileges as possible.
_	The majority of these studies support the concept that the inheritance is probably multifactorial or that a number of different genetic defects each has an elevated blood pressure as one of its phenotypic expressions.
_	It derives from the concept that the change in appearance and functionality caused by a non-silent mutation will generally stand out in a population.
_	This type of scheme is based on the concept that a victim will be promised a substantial benefit – such as a million-dollar prize, lottery winnings, a substantial inheritance, or some other item of value – but must pay in advance some purported fee or series of fees before the victim can receive that benefit.
_	Memory is influenced by practice effects, the concept that greater practice with an item results in easier retrieval; retention effects, which means that memories grow less likely to be retrieved as a longer period of time passes, and spacing effects, in which memories are more easily recalled if they are encoded into memory over a longer time interval.
_	The first was an appearance in two episodes of "Dickensian" (2015), a drama based upon the concept that author Charles Dickens' notable characters lived in the same Victorian neighbourhood.
_	The funding proposal was built around the concept that a rebuilt pier would house a ferry terminal with commuter access to Manhattan.
_	"If you had a pirate concept that had failed for five years and had a new concept, would you go back to the concept that failed for five years or try something new?
_	This raises the concept that the rate of increase in blood glucose may be a significant determinant particularly when comparing liquids to solids which release carbohydrates over time and therefore have an inherently greater area under the blood glucose curve.
_	It has been shown that the Tolman–Ehrenfest effect can be derived by applying the equivalence principle to the concept that temperature is the rate of thermal time with respect to proper time.
_	In this case, Banshee, Thunderbird and Wolverine just to prove the concept that its possible to bring the dead back to live by taking them from the time before they died.
_	According to producer Leonard Goldberg, the network was simply going to end the series with a regular episode without any kind of denouement, as network executives were totally oblivious to the concept that a television audience actually tuned in week after week and cared about the characters of a TV series.
_	Intro revolves around the concept that music is a vital element that forms a connections between all people, and electronic music is the sound of an era.
_	Prof. Ben-David states that victimology literature has not paid due attention to the complexity of the phenomenon of violence in relationships, since the establishment of centers for assisting women and feminist publications have established the concept that women are always victims and men are always attackers.
_	She borrowed the concept that the realm of production is central to human life and that the workplace is the area of both oppression and liberation from Karl Marx, while applying it to gender, rather than solely class.
_	It was organized around the concept that the Dayton Agreement, which ended the Bosnian War and provided the current structure and constitution of Bosnia and Herzegovina was an illegal abrogation of the Constitution of the wartime Republic of Bosnia and Herzegovina.
_	That is, it formalizes the concept that is normally expressed by saying that a sentence, statement or idea "is true."
_	The song basically revolves around the concept that some people have a blessed (or gifted) life, while others are not so fortunate.
_	The campaigners also pointed out that the tradition at Sabarimala is based on the concept that Ayyappa of Sabarimala is in the form of a Kumāra (teenager) observing "Brahmacharya".
_	The biopsychosocial approach reflects the concept that the psychology of an individual cannot be understood without reference to that individual’s social environment.
_	His code introduced the concept that crime is an offense against the state rather than against the individual and thus narrowed the possibilities of personal vengeance.
_	Certain image features in example images may override the concept that the user is really focusing on.
_	Predictive time delay is based on the concept that the system or the user knows when the congestion point is reached or when the delay of the freeway would be equal to the delay on city streets, and the decision for route assignment is taken in time.
_	In 1988 Parks Canada historian Lyle Dick began a substantial challenge to the concept that piblokto exists at all.
_	It was this version of the concept that was adopted by literary and art critics and became a part of the conceptual array of 1960s culture.
_	Diamond provides further analysis of other Landmark Forum concepts utilized in "The Matrix Revolutions" in her book "Stepping Into Spiritual Oneness: Spiritual Rememberings of the Soul Through Life Experience", including the concept that: "we all choose to BE who we are being in each and every moment of our experience."
_	By enlisting youth participation in creating viable employment alternatives in their home countries, the YES Campaign has validated the concept that young people, if given access to the right resources, can effectively craft their own opportunities for advancement and growth in labor markets while simultaneously addressing development needs.
_	The stories and text pieces were written with the concept that Kavalier and Clay were real people and that the Escapist had actually been a character from the Golden Age of Comics.
_	Colón and Field compare "When God Writes Your Love Story" to Derek Prince's "God Is a Matchmaker", and argue that Prince's book better expresses the concept that God allows some people to receive their soulmates quickly, while requiring others to undergo a long wait.
_	Automobile dependency is the concept that some city layouts cause automobiles to be favored over alternate forms of transportation such as bicycles, public transit, and walking.
_	The smart cow problem is the concept that, when a group of individuals is faced with a technically difficult task, only one of their members has to solve it.
_	Although there are more complex and numerous processes involved in product development, the concept that the analogy provides is enough to understand the benefits that come with concurrent design and manufacturing.
_	A classic reference to hope which has entered modern language is the concept that "Hope springs eternal" taken from Alexander Pope's "Essay on Man", the phrase reading "Hope springs eternal in the human breast, Man never is, but always "to be" blest:"
_	The proactionary principle was formulated as an opposing viewpoint to the precautionary principle, which is based on the concept that consequences of actions in complex systems are often unpredictable and irreversible and concludes that such actions should generally be opposed.
_	The corporate veil in the United Kingdom is a metaphorical reference used in UK company law for the concept that the rights and duties of a corporation are, as a general principle, the responsibility of that company alone.
_	His era had already defined animism, the concept that the energy (or life) in an object derives from a spiritual component.
_	Pierce expresses the concept that boys and girls are alike.
_	However, these models are derived under the concept that the respondent obtains some utility for each possible answer and gives the answer that provides the greatest utility.
_	As he argues, "it seems that it is this very nature of the concept that has allowed, on the one hand, human rights to receive such international acceptance as a theoretical enterprise and, on the other hand, has led the concept to be constantly challenged by different cultures worldwide."
_	By altering the story in accordance to both of the authors’ writing styles and beliefs of how the black characters should be portrayed, Ellis expresses the concept that there is no one black identity that can be defined.
_	Even though Clark could make the wrong choices, season five's "Aqua" helped illustrate the concept that Clark was "... good to the core".
_	This is the concept that involuntary memories have the tendency to trigger other involuntary memories that are related.
_	In addition, the site does not have the concept that is another cornerstone of Wikipedia.
_	It features actors portraying various dramatic scenes based on "the concept that a single act of kindness…
_	Advertisements are based on the concept that the bunny powered by a Duracell alkaline battery can continue functioning longer than an identical device running on inherently lower-duration zinc-carbon batteries.
_	Hence the concept that there was a natural grouping of monocots whose flowers were predominantly petaloid, gave notion to the term "petaloid monocots".
_	Noted decisions include "Corning Glass Works v. Ann & Hope, Inc. of Danvers", overruling "General Elec. Co. v. Kimball Jewelers, Inc.", and holding that the nonsigner provision of the Fair Trade Law was an unconstitutional delegation of legislative power to private parties; and "Green v. Commissioner of Corps. & Taxation", rejecting the concept that a woman's domicil is always that of her husband; "Hendrickson v. Sears", holding that the statute of limitations did not commence to run in favor of an attorney until the client discovered, or reasonably should have discovered, the attorney's error; "Hershkoff v. Board of Registrars of Voters of Worcester", concerning the domicil of students for voting purposes; "Carpenter v. Suffolk Franklin Sav. Bank", a purported class action concerning mortgagors' asserted rights to savings banks' earnings on real estate tax payments; and "Secretary of the Commonwealth v. City Clerk of Lowell", holding that, absent fraud, people may select and change their names freely.
_	Initially, the mathematical theory behind spontaneous symmetry breaking was conceived and published within particle physics by Yoichiro Nambu in 1960, and the concept that such a mechanism could offer a possible solution for the "mass problem" was originally suggested in 1962 by Philip Anderson (who had previously written papers on broken symmetry and its outcomes in superconductivity.
_	This, and the possibility of a "general glut", an over accumulation of capital to produce goods for sale rather than for use, became the foundation of a rising critique of the concept that free markets with competition would be sufficient to prevent disastrous downturns in the economy, and whether the need for expansion would inevitably lead to war.
_	The programme launched with the concept that the presenters should interact with each other rather than present items on their own, as was then the case on "Top Gear".
_	Finally, Horayot brings the discussion from lofty heights to a humble note, highlighting the concept that even the Sages and "battei din" can err.
_	Baker concludes that "it is refreshing indeed to find such current agreement on the concept that has involved so significant a portion of our best academic talent."
_	In order to distinguish number sense in animals from the symbolic and verbal number system in humans researchers use the term "numerosity", rather than "number", to refer to the concept that supports approximate estimation but does not support an exact representation of number quality.
_	Positive peace refers to the absence of indirect and structural violence, and is the concept that most peace and conflict researchers adopt.
_	She started studying sociology, which examined religion from several new perspectives such as feminism and Marxism, and first exposed her to the concept that religions could serve as a means of social control.
_	The term "ancient astronauts" is used to refer to various forms of the concept that extraterrestrials visited Earth in the distant past.
_	After the adoption of agriculture and sedentary cultures, the concept that one gender was inferior to the other was established; most often this was imposed upon women and girls.
_	The basic turn-taking model for conversation was founded through empirical investigation of field recordings of conversations and fitted to the concept that in conversation, participants are expected to issue their utterances in allocated turns.
_	In "The Simpsons" episode "Whacking Day", Homer presents the concept that everyone has a good and a bad self to Lisa, who then imagines Homer's evil version dancing on the grave of good Homer while singing 'I am Evil Homer, I am Evil Homer', implying that within him the battle for good and evil has long ago been won by his bad angel.
_	This is explored through the concept that human beings have animalistic features.
_	Despite detaining the majority of the Brazilian population there is a common sense that the Centro-Sul (except the favela minority in large cities) is the least representative of the country's reality, this is due to the high social indicators that go against the concept that the country is underdeveloped.
_	Dr. Ned T. Sahin based the entire clinical trail upon the concept that every child or adult with autism is different.
_	Armstrong appointed Saul Hansell, a technology and finance reporter of "The New York Times" to run a journalism and engineering system for AOL called Seed, based on the concept that editors can make decisions on what to write about by compiling data and algorithms from the leading search engines like Google and social network sites like Facebook.
_	Following the concept that the uniqueness of natural, cultural and economic specificities are the constitutive elements of and decisive factors for the transformation of geographic space and territorial development at all scales in the context of the local/global nexus, the overall objectives of TERCUD are to design, implement and disseminate research and other scientific activities in favour of:
_	To her, these mass deportations were based on the concept that nationalities were "sociohistorical groups with a shared consciousness and not racial-biological groups".
_	Inversional equivalency or inversional symmetry is the concept that intervals, chords, and other sets of pitches are the same when inverted.
_	A lexical chain can provide a context for the resolution of an ambiguous term and enable identification of the concept that the term represents.
_	Such rights are based on the concept that each person freely decides if, when, and how many children to have - not the state or church.
_	Overcriminalization is the concept that criminalization has become excessive, meaning that an excessive number of laws and regulations deeming conduct illegal have a detrimental effect on society, particularly with respect to victimless crimes and actions which make conduct illegal without criminal intent on the part of the individual.
_	In a system with endogenous money creation and where production decisions and outcomes are decentralized and potentially intractable to forecasting, this analysis provides support to the concept that the risk-free rate may not be directly observable.
_	In Thomas Schelling's (1966) classic work on deterrence, the concept that military strategy can no longer be defined as the science of military victory is presented.
_	Biographical Criticism, like New Historicism, rejects the concept that literary studies should be limited to the internal or formal characteristics of a literary work, and insists that it properly includes a knowledge of the contexts in which the work was created.
_	It translates as "nobility obliges" and denotes the concept that nobility extends beyond mere entitlements and requires the person who holds such a status to fulfill social responsibilities.
_	Architect Arthur Erickson is credited by some with developing the concept that became Vancouverism in the mid-1950s, in a never-realized development called "Project 56".
_	After this sentence, no further attempt was made to discuss Kant's term and the concept that it designates.
_	For each concept there is a triad of 1) the concept in our minds, 2) the real-world things conceptualized by the concept, and 3) a representation of the concept that we can use to think and communicate about the concept and its corresponding real-world things.
_	The mental timeline refers to the concept that time is implicitly related to space.
_	Others directly address the topic of racism, such as "The Making of the UN Charter" (1945), which incorporates collaged newspaper clippings and images of body parts, and which "express[es] the concept that Blacks died for the idea of freedom in World War II, but were denied a place in their own country as stated in human rights declarations at the United Nations."
_	This makes precise the concept that formula_65 restricted to "this particular" formula_60-dimensional subspace has a local maximum at formula_50.
_	In 1793 and 1794, Barère focused on speaking of his doctrine, which included the teaching of national patriotism through an organized system of universal education, the national widespread of patriotic devotion, and the concept that one owed his nation his services.
_	However, it is noteworthy that some of the more unsympathetic reviews misinterpreted songwriter Johnny Borrell's intended themes and lyrics, a fundamental aspect being the biblical imagery running throughout the song, not a result of some presumed messiah complex, but rather because during the songwriting process for Slipway Fires, Borrell "was learning a bit about Catholicism [and] was very interested in the concept that we’re ordinary sinners."
_	United States consumer advocate Ralph Nader called Gandhi "the greatest consumer advocate the world has seen" for advancing the concept that commercial enterprise should serve the consumer and that the consumer should expect to be served by business.
_	According to author Gordon Thomas' 2007 book "Secrets and Lies" the CIA's Operation Often was also initiated by the chief of the CIA's Technical Services Branch, Dr. Sidney Gottlieb, to "explore the world of black magic" and "harness the forces of darkness and challenge the concept that the inner reaches of the mind are beyond reach".
_	This evolutionary model of cultural information transfer is based on the concept that units of information, or "memes", have an independent existence, are self-replicating, and are subject to selective evolution through environmental forces.
_	The Old Testament use of the word includes the concept that those showing favor do gracious deeds, or acts of grace, such as being kind to the poor and showing generosity.
_	The document did not include the concept that the defamation of religion is racist and should be banned.
_	In law, the principle of imputation or attribution underpins the concept that "ignorantia juris non excusat"—ignorance of the law does not excuse.
_	The work, through the use of metaphors and similes, focuses on the concept that all living creatures will eventually evolve into perfect beings.
_	The shapes of the curves were chosen "based on the concept that the rate of weight loss would progressively decrease and reach a relative plateau" at the final weight.
_	With the concept that no single organization can move the state forward on their own, Equality Louisiana or EQLA served to proactively coordinate statewide efforts.
_	Green growth is the concept that embodies the harmony of environment (Green) and economy (Growth).
_	Producer of the series Kerry Appleyard revealed that the concept for the show came from the creator and writer of the show Keith Brumpton who had the idea it would be fun to do a kids spy show and worked on the concept that kids find it very hard to keep secrets.
_	Grigg has promoted the concept that "white Leninists" desired to send "millions of Mexicans across the border with the idea of having each kill 10 Americans".
_	In his writings and public presentations, he explained how courts and lawmakers were struggling with the concept that a person might bet too much because they were ill, rather than because they were morally weak.
_	While the concept of "serious play" may sound like an oxymoron, it is the dual nature of the concept that makes it powerful.
_	Intrinsic to the idea of synaptic allocation is the concept that multiple synapses can be activated by a given set of inputs, but specific mechanisms determine which synapses actually go on the encode the memory.
_	According to Griffith, he "rewrote about a quarter of the film that was shot, then re-shot, and I added the concept that there had been thousands of years since violence existed, so that Barbarella was very clumsy all through the picture.
_	Early work in molecular genetics suggested the concept that one gene makes one protein.
_	In the very early periods of Egyptian history, the main iconographic representations of this goddess appear to have been limited to her hunting and war characteristics, although there is no Egyptian mythological reference to support the concept that this was her primary function as a deity.
_	If there is a tie involving the knocker, the knocker pays, this is in accordance with the concept that the one betting must beat at least one player or else they pay up.
_	There were minor variations from one manufacturer to another, but most typewriters followed the concept that each key was attached to a typebar that had the corresponding letter molded, in reverse, into its striking head.
_	The main Kōshin belief that survived from an original complex faith, is the concept that Three Corpses, called "Sanshi" (三尸), live in everyone's body.
_	The gauge employs the concept that different thicknesses of coatings are different colors.
_	According to Robin A. Williams and David Edge (1996), "Central to social shaping of technology (SST) is the concept that there are choices (though not necessarily conscious choices) inherent in both the design of individual artifacts and systems, and in the direction or trajectory of innovation programs."
_	Lyrically, the song is centered around the concept that global change cannot occur without personal reflection, with Hawkins repeating the lines of "Everybody wants to change the world/ But no one ever wants to change themselves" and "We can change it all/ If you really want it" throughout the course of the song.
_	The particular philosophy espoused has been identified as a form of pandeism, the concept that a god created the universe by becoming the universe.
_	The viewer is encouraged to acknowledge the universality of human nature and the artist invites the viewer to open their mind to the concept that we are all human beings with shared common experiences.
_	The academy promotes Reintegrationism, the concept that the language spoken in Galicia (dubbed the Galician language by some) is in fact merely a dialect of the Portuguese language and should be standardized to the international Portuguese norms of language.
_	Jackson was disappointed in the book's lack of new ideas, noting that it merely expands on the concept that "you have to be born at the right moment; at the right place; to the right family (posh usually helps); and then you have to work really, really hard.
_	'It is this concept of transformative progressive freedom that provides the key to Nina Rapi's first play "Ithaka", a play that looks at the darker side of sexuality...' & "'Ithaka" explores the concept that individuals are constantly subconsciously attracted to conflict and domination...Most important, "Ithaka" is a dark comedy – surreal in some aspects, bizarelly "realistic" in others.
_	Kaplan work centers around the concept that Judaism ought not to be defined as the religion of the Jews, but the sum of Jewish religion, culture, language, literature and social organization.
_	Fairhaven School is run on the concept that all students and staff members should have equal rights and voices in the running of the school.
_	Historically, extimacy named the concept that no useful distinction separated the psyche from the external world.
_	Coleman is a leader in developing and sharing the concept that in season extension a distinction can be made between extending the "growing" season and extending the "harvest" season.
_	Most psychodynamic approaches are centered on the concept that some maladaptive functioning is in play, and that this maladaption is, at least in part, unconscious.
_	In his Monitor Theory, Krashen advanced the concept that language input should be at the "i+1" level, just beyond what the learner can fully understand; this input is comprehensible, but contains structures that are not yet fully understood.
_	The poem discusses the idea of time and the concept that only the present moment really matters because the past cannot be changed and the future is unknown.
_	Feeding in these camps came to depend upon the employment of civilian cooks (shearers' cooks etc.) who were well paid and their general lack of culinary skills fixed firmly in the minds of the officers and men the concept that the cook was a deplorable necessity.
_	The game was shipped with no information on how to play, thus building the concept that the player did hack into a system.
_	Dr. Dario Salas Sommer puts forth the concept that ‘moral laws’ exist for both individuals and nations.
_	The party propagates Ketuanan Melayu, the concept that the Bumiputra, including ethnic Malays, enjoy a special status within the country by virtue of their earlier settlement of the lands that now form Malaysia and as a result of the recognition of Malays in Article 153 of the Constitution of Malaysia.
_	The book's main contribution to Faustian literature is the introduction of the concept that above all other people it is Satan who most truly believes in the Gospel – and yet he is forbidden ever to partake of it.
_	He was considered an advocate of the concept that government incomes policy should prevent inflationary wage and price settlements in connection to the customary fiscal and monetary means of regulating the economy.
_	The schools were built on the concept that fresh air, good ventilation and exposure to the outside contributed to improved health.
_	Nicco Park's "educative recreational initiative" is the concept that families should not only have a fun-filled experience but also have learned something during their time at the park.
_	Natal astrology, also known as genethliacal astrology, is the system of astrology based on the concept that each individual's personality or path in life can be determined by constructing a natal chart for the exact date, time, and locations of that individual's birth.
_	Adler initiated and led a three-and-a-half-week study on the concept that was later selected as the Mars Exploration Rover (MER) mission for 2003.
_	uRPF as defined in RFC 3704 is an evolution of the concept that traffic from known invalid networks should not be accepted on interfaces from which they should never have originated.
_	Mainstream literature on Earth's Precambrian geology—the Archean (4.0-2.5 b.y. ago), and Proterozoic (2.5-0.54 b.y.) eons—has been dominated since the 1980s by the concept that plate-tectonic and "plume" processes, like those thought to be operating now, were then active, and that Earth's thermal structure and geodynamics have varied relatively little through time.
_	This theory was based on the concept that there must be a shift in risk factors leading up to a shift in causes of death and disease.
_	In 1937, he created his first Impossible stairs, and the concept that would lead to the impossible fork.
_	His approach to art and the concept that the world is a field of diverse energetic vibrations have been essential to Díaz’s development in contemporary art.
_	With "Cherokee Nation v. Georgia", it supported the concept that tribes were not independent states but "domestic dependent nations".
_	Gray witches practice balance and harmony, and they deny the concept that such things can occur without recognition of total and true polarity.
_	In this series, the concept that we know of as "Noblesse Oblige" (a French term meaning "nobility obligates", implying those with power have the obligation to use it to help those without) historically stems from the behavior of the Noblesse (Rai), who protected the weak.
_	There are stories of Zhou Dunyi loving his grass so much that he would not cut it, reinforcing the concept that humans should appreciate life in nature and the importance of non-action.
_	Among Fei Xiaotong's contributions to anthropology is the concept that Chinese social relations work through social networks of personal relations with the self at the center and decreasing closeness as one moves out.
_	Contributing to the rancorous debates during the War of 1812, Founding Father Gouverneur Morris of Pennsylvania and New York—a Federalist, a Hamilton ally and a primary author of the Constitution who advanced the concept that Americans were citizens of a single Union of the states—was persuaded to claim that "secession, under certain circumstances, was entirely constitutional."
_	Jeff Bezos was responsible for the concept that led to Amazon's Mechanical Turk being developed to realize this process.
_	The show is based around the concept that the renovations most desired by a homeowner aren't necessarily always the ones most urgently needed in the home.
_	In his 1998 book, "The Inmates Are Running the Asylum: Why High-Tech Products Drive Us Crazy and How to Restore the Sanity", Alan Cooper outlined his methodology, called Goal-Directed design, based on the concept that software should speed the user towards his or her ultimate goal rather than ensnare him or her in computer minutiae.
_	Most (but not all) definitions are based on the concept that a 1000-pound (454 kg) cow, with or without an unweaned calf, is one animal unit, with such a cow being assumed to consume 26 pounds (about 12 kg) of forage dry matter per day.
_	However, the concept that larger is better negates the underlying complexities.
_	Emil Körner, who stood out for his brilliant background and great war experience, under the concept that he must realize in Chile the necessary reforms to transform its army into a mirror of the Prussian, a five year work agreement, with contract renewal.
_	Indeed, so deeply is he committed to the concept that men are alike that he may even fancy that there exists a kind of human dead center in which everyone is identical with everyone else, and that if he can hit that psychic bull's eye he can make all mankind twitch at once".
_	Generally, power is the concept that collects all the analysis together.
_	Later, he explored the concept that mental illness represents a crisis brought about by the failure to grow into higher social loyalties, including loyalty to God.
_	The sticking point was the AFL's demand for representational exclusivity (the concept that if a majority of workers voted for the union then all employees in the bargaining unit should belong to the union).
_	It is based on the concept that some pieces of music can or will harm either the listener or the performer.
_	The book in centered around the concept that William Shakespeare's ghost materializes and records his assertations on how he in fact did write his own works.
